


































Nicholas T. Long v. Dell, Inc. – CourtListener.com














Toggle navigation













About
FAQ
Tour

Donate


Sign in / Register




From Free Law Project, a 501(c)(3) non-profit.









Opinions


RECAP Archive


Oral Arguments


Judges


Visualizations 



Gallery


SCOTUS Networks


New Network




Donate










Your Notes

                    (edit)
                     


                    (none)
                



Authorities (40)
This opinion cites:



                                Anderson v. Liberty Lobby, 477 U.S. 242 (1986)
                            



                                Matsushita Electric Industrial Co., Ltd. v. Zenith Radio Corporation, 475 ...
                            



                                Lewis v. Casey, 518 U.S. 343 (1996)
                            



                                52 Fair empl.prac.cas. 253, 52 Empl. Prac. Dec. P 39,659 ...
                            



                                Davis v. Passman, 442 U.S. 228 (1979)
                            




                        View All Authorities
                    



Share



 
        

 
        

 

        





Support FLP 

            CourtListener is a project of Free
            Law Project, a federally-recognized 501(c)(3) non-profit. We
            rely on donations for our financial security.
        
Please support our work with a donation.

Donate Now





Nicholas T. Long v. Dell, Inc., 12-248, 12-249 (R.I. 2014)





                        Sign in or register to save a favorite.
                    

(click to dismiss)



Supreme Court of Rhode Island

Filed:

                    June 27th, 2014
                    
                


Precedential Status:

                    Precedential
                


Citations:

                    None known
                


Docket Number:

                    12-248, 12-249
                



                        Download Original 




                                        Combined Opinion from
                                        our Backup
                                    




                                        Combined Opinion from
                                        the Court
                                    








                                                     Supreme Court

                                                     No. 2012-248-Appeal.
                                                     No. 2012-249-Appeal.
                                                     (PB 03-2636)



Nicholas T. Long et al.           :

          v.                      :

   Dell, Inc., et al.             :




    NOTICE: This opinion is subject to formal revision before
    publication in the Rhode Island Reporter. Readers are requested to
    notify the Opinion Analyst, Supreme Court of Rhode Island,
    250 Benefit Street, Providence, Rhode Island 02903, at Telephone
    222-3258 of any typographical or other formal errors in order that
    corrections may be made before the opinion is published.
                                                                  Supreme Court

                                                                  No. 2012-248-Appeal.
                                                                  No. 2012-249-Appeal.
                                                                  (PB 03-2636)
                                                      (Dissent and concurrence begin on Page 28)


          Nicholas T. Long et al.             :

                     v.                       :

              Dell, Inc., et al.              :


              Present: Suttell, C.J., Goldberg, Flaherty, Robinson, and Indeglia, JJ.


                                         OPINION

       Justice Goldberg, for the Court. In this putative class action, the plaintiffs allege that

Dell1 violated the Deceptive Trade Practices Act (DTPA), G.L. 1956 chapter 13.1 of title 6, and

that Dell was negligent by improperly collecting sales taxes on certain services purchased in

conjunction with the sales of its computer products. A justice of the Superior Court granted

summary judgment in favor of Dell on both counts. This case has been pending for more than

ten years and thus far has resulted in two opinions of this Court. It is not over. For the reasons

set forth below, we affirm the grant of summary judgment on the negligence count and on the

request for injunctive relief by the plaintiff, Nicholas T. Long. However, the grant of summary

judgment on the DTPA count by the plaintiff Julianne Ricci is vacated. Additionally, we affirm


1
  The named defendants are Dell Computer Corporation, Dell Catalog Sales Limited Partnership,
Dell Marketing Limited Partnership, QualxServ, LLC, and BancTec, Inc. The nuances of the
legal relationships among these entities were discussed in our previous opinions in this case. See
Long v. Dell, Inc., 984 A.2d 1074, 1076 (R.I. 2009); DeFontes v. Dell, Inc., 984 A.2d 1061,
1062 (R.I. 2009). In this opinion, “Dell” and “defendants” refer to the collective Dell entities
(Dell Computer Corporation, Dell Catalog Sales Limited Partnership, and Dell Marketing
Limited Partnership).

                                               -1-
the Superior Court justice’s grant of the plaintiffs’ motion to strike the tax administrator’s

affirmative defenses.2

                                         Facts and Travel

         This Court discussed the facts of this case in detail in two previous opinions. See Long v.

Dell, Inc., 984 A.2d 1074, 1075-78 (R.I. 2009); DeFontes v. Dell, Inc., 984 A.2d 1061, 1062-65

(R.I. 2009). Therefore, we will only recount recent events and those facts that are necessary for

context.

         The named plaintiffs, Nicholas Long (Long) and Julianne Ricci (Ricci) (collectively and

on behalf of the putative class, plaintiffs), purchased Dell computers in late 2000. Along with

their computers, they also selected an optional service contract, which essentially amounted to an

extended warranty on the computers.3 As the receipt for payment, Ricci received a three-page

“acknowledgment” with her order.          The first item listed on the acknowledgement is a

“Dimension 4100 Series, Pentium Processor at 866 MHz”—presumably the main computer

component. The “Unit Price” and “Amount” set forth for this item were both “1,576.00.” The

next thirty lines in the acknowledgement contained different item numbers and product

descriptions, all of which set forth the “Unit Price” and “Amount” as “0.00.” Finally, a printer

cable was listed with a “Unit Price” and “Amount” of “24.95.” A box on the front page of the

acknowledgement summarized the charges. The computer, the printer cable, and a shipping and

handling charge of $105 brought the subtotal to $1,705.95. The box also set forth that $233 of

that amount was taxable, and thus a tax of $16.31 was added. The total paid by Ricci to Dell was

$1,722.26. Ricci purchased her computer for personal use.


2
    We consolidate the two appeals for purposes of this opinion.
3
  These service contracts were actually third-party contracts, whereby third parties, including
defendants BancTec and QualxServ, would handle any repairs. Long, 984 A.2d at 1076.
                                                -2-
          Long received a similar “acknowledgment” with his order. Only the first line contained a

“Unit Price” and “Amount”—both were “2,804.00.” The summary box added a shipping and

handling charge of $35 for a subtotal of $2,839. The box denoted that the entire $2,839 subtotal

was taxable and charged $198.73 in tax. Thus, Long ultimately paid a total of $3,037.73 to Dell.

Unlike Ricci, Long purchased his Dell computer for business purposes.

          This class action lawsuit commenced in May 2003.4 The crux of the complaint is that

Dell charged both Ricci and Long sales tax on nontaxable services.5 The two-count complaint

alleged that defendants violated the DTPA and were liable for negligence. In their prayer for

relief, plaintiffs requested damages, as well as declaratory and injunctive relief. The defendants

moved to stay the proceedings and compel arbitration, arguing that by accepting delivery of the

goods, plaintiffs agreed to the terms and conditions agreement, which contained an arbitration

provision. The Superior Court justice denied that motion and entered an order of final judgment

on March 29, 2004. The defendants appealed from that judgment.

          In March 2005, Dell requested a determination from the Rhode Island Division of

Taxation regarding the application of the sales and use tax. The Division of Taxation responded

with a letter ruling.6 The letter ruling, which was written by the Chief Revenue Agent, began its


4
  Mary DeFontes initially filed this action, but she is no longer a plaintiff. See DeFontes, 984
A.2d at 1062, 1072. Long joined the suit as a plaintiff in July 2003. Id. at 1062. Ricci replaced
DeFontes in June 2005, upon discovery that DeFontes was an employee of plaintiffs’ counsel.
Id. at 1065.
5
  There is no allegation that Dell retained the tax collected; it is undisputed that Dell remitted the
tax collected to the state.
6
    The Division of Taxation describes a “letter ruling” as follows:

          “A General Informational Letter, (commonly referred to as a ‘Letter Ruling’) is
          unlike a Declaratory Ruling in that it generally seeks an interpretation of tax law
          or regulation without applying it to a specific set of facts. A General
          Informational Letter may be issued where it appears that general information only
                                                 -3-
discussion by referencing Regulation SU 00-126, entitled “Optional Service, Maintenance, and

Extended Warranty Contracts,” which stated, inter alia, that “[t]he charge for the optional

service, maintenance, or extended warranty contract is not subject to tax when such a charge is

separately stated by the retailer to the purchaser.” The letter stated that “[t]he intent of the

regulation is to exempt an optional service, maintenance, and extended warranty contract from

sales tax when the contract is optional to the buyer, and the charge is separately stated by the

retailer to the purchaser.” Initially, the ruling stated that when a Dell invoice or acknowledgment

“provided to a customer showed a total sales price for all items in the order and a unit price of

‘0.00[’] for each individual item, including the service contract and extended warranty, the sales

tax was properly applied to the total sales price.” Directly applying the facts here, however, the

letter concluded, “Since the service contract is optional to the buyer and a separate charge under

‘taxable amount’ is noted elsewhere on the invoice or acknowledgement as being for a 3rd party

service contract, [Dell] Catalog should not have imposed the sales tax.”

       In March 2007, while the appeal of the order denying the motion to compel arbitration

was pending, defendants moved for summary judgment. In response, plaintiffs requested that the

Tax Administrator for the Rhode Island Division of Taxation (the tax administrator) be notified

of the proceeding because defendants’ contentions on summary judgment implicated Rhode

Island tax law. The tax administrator then moved to intervene in the case. The Superior Court

justice permitted the tax administrator to intervene solely “for the purpose of appearing and



       is requested, or where a request for a Declaratory Ruling does not comply with all
       the requirements for a Declaratory Ruling. General Informational Letters may not
       be relied upon by any taxpayer other than the taxpayer who requested the
       information. General Informational [L]etters are not binding on the Tax Division
       if there has been a misstatement or omission of material facts or, on a prospective
       basis, if there has been a change in law or applicable regulations or a decision on
       point is issued by the Rhode Island or Federal Courts.” Regulation DR 03-01.
                                               -4-
being heard on the issues of subject matter jurisdiction, the proper interpretation and construction

of tax regulations and statutes, and the application and constitutional validity of tax statutes.”

The tax administrator moved to dismiss the case for lack of subject-matter jurisdiction. The

Superior Court justice denied the motion to dismiss. The defendants and the tax administrator

petitioned this Court for writs of certiorari to review the question of subject-matter jurisdiction,

and we granted the petitions.

       On December 14, 2009, this Court issued separate opinions on these preliminary issues.

In DeFontes, 984 A.2d at 1073, we held that the Superior Court justice properly denied

defendants’ motion to compel arbitration because plaintiffs did not agree to be bound by the

terms and conditions in the shrinkwrap agreement contained in the computer’s packaging. In

Long, 984 A.2d at 1081, we held that that the Superior Court had subject-matter jurisdiction over

the DTPA claim and ancillary jurisdiction over the negligence claim. We remanded the case to

the Superior Court. Id. at 1082.

       With the arbitration and subject-matter jurisdiction issues resolved, the Superior Court

turned to defendants’ summary judgment motion. First, the Superior Court justice decided to

consider only the facts and claims of the individual plaintiffs—not the purported class of

plaintiffs—because the class had not yet been certified. Additionally, he noted that after his

previous decision and this Court’s opinions, the only claims that remained as to Long were those

seeking equitable or declaratory relief because Long’s claims under the DTPA and for

negligence had been dismissed. Addressing those claims, the Superior Court justice concluded

that the prayer to enjoin defendants from collecting improper taxes was moot because there was

no evidence to suggest that defendants continue to improperly collect the tax. Accordingly, for

purposes of summary judgment, the Superior Court justice considered “only the claims of



                                               -5-
improper collection of tax on the optional service contract, as evidenced in Ricci’s

acknowledgment of her purchase of a Dell computer, and the facts associated therewith.”

       Next, the Superior Court justice concluded that Ricci should not have been charged a

sales tax on her service contract. Although service contracts were not taxable in Rhode Island,

Dell contended that Rhode Island Tax Regulation SU 00-126, which provided that “[t]he charge

for the optional service, maintenance or extended warranty contract is not subject to tax when

such charge is separately stated by the retailer to the purchaser,” nonetheless mandated that a tax

be charged because Dell contends the “acknowledgement” it sent to Ricci did not separately state

the service contract price. However, in its 2005 letter ruling, the Division of Taxation concluded

that Dell’s “acknowledgement” did, in fact, separately state the service contract price, and Dell

should not have taxed the service contract. Based on the letter ruling, the tax regulation, and the

opinions of this Court, in particular language from our opinion in Long, the Superior Court

justice found that Dell improperly charged Ricci $16.31 in sales tax on the optional service

contract.

       Having concluded that Ricci was improperly taxed, the Superior Court justice next

addressed Dell’s legal arguments that it was nonetheless not liable under the DTPA or in

negligence.7 Addressing the negligence claim, he concluded that “[a] seller’s duty with regard to

the collection of sales tax is to the State, not the consumer.” He reasoned that the seller is

subject to state penalties for failing to properly remit sales taxes to the state. Further, he noted

that there is little incentive for a seller to over-collect taxes. Comparatively, any injury to a

consumer is relatively minor. Finally, consumers now have an independent right to seek a



7
  The trial justice concluded that three other theories—DTPA exemption for collection of sales
tax, sovereign immunity, and unclean hands—did not preclude Dell’s potential liability to Ricci.
Dell did not raise these issues on appeal.
                                               -6-
refund if they are inappropriately taxed. Accordingly, the Superior Court justice concluded that

Dell did not owe a duty to Ricci, and therefore Ricci did not have an actionable tort claim.

       Turning to the DTPA claim, the Superior Court justice first addressed whether the

practice was “unfair.” The court concluded that “Dell’s honest misinterpretation of a delicate

area of the state tax law cannot be held to be an unfair act.” The Superior Court justice noted

that Ricci did not come forth with any evidence tending to prove that Dell acted immorally or

unethically. He also questioned whether Ricci’s monetary injury of $16.31 was “substantial.”

Next, the court addressed whether Dell’s actions were “deceptive” under the DTPA. Although

the Superior Court justice found that charging a sales tax constituted a representation that was

misleading, he concluded that the misrepresentation was not “material” to constitute a deceptive

act under the statute because it was so paltry as to have no effect on Ricci’s decision to purchase

the product.8 Accordingly, the court concluded that “as a matter of law, Dell’s actions did not

constitute negligence or violate the DTPA.”

       In the same decision, the Superior Court justice also addressed plaintiffs’ motion to strike

the tax administrator’s affirmative defenses.9 Noting that no claims had been asserted against the

tax administrator and that the conditions precedent to the allegedly conditional defenses had not

arisen in this case, the Superior Court justice struck the defenses as immaterial under Rule 12(f)

of the Superior Court Rules of Civil Procedure.

       On April 9, 2012, an order and final judgment entered, granting defendants’ motion for

summary judgment and plaintiffs’ motion to strike. The plaintiffs appealed the order granting
8
  The Superior Court justice drew this conclusion from Ricci’s deposition testimony, where she
stated that she did not care about the sales tax, only the total price of the computer.
9
  The affirmative defenses were (1) statute of limitations; (2) unclean hands; (3) “he who
demands equity must do equity”; (4) setoff and recoupment; (5) statutory setoff; (6) failure to
state a claim upon which relief may be granted; and (7) failure to exhaust administrative
remedies.
                                               -7-
summary judgment to defendants, and the tax administrator appealed the order striking his

affirmative defenses.

                                      Standard of Review

       “[T]his Court reviews a grant of summary judgment de novo.” Sullo v. Greenberg, 68
A.3d 404, 406 (R.I. 2013) (quoting Sacco v. Cranston School Department, 53 A.3d 147, 149-50

(R.I. 2012)). We examine the case “from the vantage point of the trial justice who passed on the

motion for summary judgment, [and] ‘[w]e view the evidence in the light most favorable to the

nonmoving party * * *.’” Id. (quoting Sacco, 53 A.3d at 150). In performing this review, we

draw all reasonable inferences in favor of the nonmoving party. See Peloquin v. Haven Health

Center of Greenville, LLC, 61 A.3d 419, 424-25 (R.I. 2013) (noting that “the facts and all

reasonable inferences therefrom” are viewed “in the light most favorable to the nonmoving

party”) (quoting Derderian v. Essex Insurance Co., 44 A.3d 122, 126-27 (R.I. 2012)).

“Ultimately, the ‘purpose of the summary judgment procedure is issue finding, not issue

determination.’” DeMaio v. Ciccone, 59 A.3d 125, 130 (R.I. 2013) (quoting Estate of Giuliano

v. Giuliano, 949 A.2d 386, 391 (R.I. 2008)). Summary judgment is appropriate only when “there

is no genuine issue as to any material fact and * * * the moving party is entitled to judgment as

[a] matter of law.” Sola v. Leighton, 45 A.3d 502, 506 (R.I. 2012) (quoting Plunkett v. State,

869 A.2d 1185, 1187 (R.I. 2005)). If the evidence submitted permits an inference that creates a

genuine issue of material fact, the motion must be denied. See DeMaio, 59 A.3d at 132 (holding

that a Superior Court justice may not choose between conflicting inferences at summary

judgment stage).    “[S]ummary judgment is a drastic remedy, and a motion for summary

judgment should be dealt with cautiously.” Cruz v. DaimlerChrysler Motors Corp., 66 A.3d 446,

451 (R.I. 2013) (quoting DeMaio, 59 A.3d at 129).



                                              -8-
       Furthermore, this case presents the issue of whether, for purposes of a motion for

summary judgment, the Court should treat the alleged class as certified, or whether the Court

should only consider the facts pertaining to the named plaintiffs.10 At the outset of his analysis,

the Superior Court justice stated, “Because the class is not certified, this Court will consider the

[m]otion on the facts and claims of the individually-named Plaintiffs, and not those of any

purported class.” The defendants contend that this is the correct approach and cite federal case

law purporting to support that proposition. The plaintiffs, however, argue that the Court must

treat the class as certified because the Court views the evidence in the light most favorable to the

nonmoving party at the summary judgment stage.

       This Court previously has stated that, “[b]ecause we review this evidence in the light

most favorable to plaintiffs [i.e., the nonmoving party], to the extent that it relates to our

decision, we treat this case as though it were certified as a class action.” Chavers v. Fleet Bank

(RI), N.A., 844 A.2d 666, 679 n.12 (R.I. 2004). We adhere to that reasoning in the case at bar.

Such a rule is most consistent with our summary judgment jurisprudence, which requires that,

when performing de novo review, we view the evidence in the light most favorable to the

nonmoving party. See Sullo, 68 A.3d at 406. Furthermore, this approach promotes the class

action objectives of compensation for small injuries and efficiency.           See 1 William B.

Rubenstein, Newberg on Class Actions § 1:7 at 17-21 (5th ed. 2013) (noting that, when

individual claims are for small amounts of money, a class action is the only practical means to


10
   The defendants contend that plaintiffs waived this issue by failing to claim it as a ground of
error in their opening brief. We disagree. Although plaintiffs did not address the issue in the
context of the standard of review, they did contend that it was “plain error” for the Superior
Court justice to question whether the improperly charged sales tax caused substantial injury
because the class had not been certified; for this proposition, plaintiffs cited Chavers v. Fleet
Bank (RI), N.A., 844 A.2d 666, 679 n.12 (R.I. 2004). Thus, we are satisfied that plaintiffs
sufficiently raised the issue, and it is appropriately before the Court.

                                               -9-
seek compensation); id. § 1:9 at 26 (“Aggregate litigation promotes administrative efficiency.”).

This principle of treating the class as certified, however, does not mean that a plaintiff can

simply multiply a small injury to an individual plaintiff by a large number with no basis in fact.

There must be evidence in the record from which a factfinder could infer facts that may apply

class-wide.

       The legal basis underpinning the cases cited by defendants is that a precertification ruling

does not bind absent class members. While that is true, we decline to draw the conclusion that

such a rule then compels this Court to disregard the procedural standard when confronted with a

summary judgment motion. The question of who will be bound by a judgment is markedly

different from the question of what is the appropriate decisional standard. Furthermore, none of

the cases cited by defendants addresses the unique summary judgment issue that confronts us in

this case. In Lewis v. Casey, 518 U.S. 343, 357-58 (1996), the United States Supreme Court

merely commented that the named plaintiffs in a class action must have standing. Also, the

Court was reviewing a bench trial; it was not reviewing a summary judgment ruling. Id. In

Jackson v. Resolution GGF Oy, 136 F.3d 1130, 1132 (7th Cir. 1998), the Seventh Circuit

dismissed a defendant because no individual plaintiff had standing against that defendant; again,

the summary judgment standard was not a concern. Finally, defendants cite a quote from an

unreported trial court decision, Evans v. Taco Bell Corp., CIV. 04CV103JD, 2005 WL 2333841,

at *3, *4 (D.N.H. Sept. 23, 2005), that was made in the context of a motion to strike. There, the

court refused to consider a doctor’s affidavit that contained a medical opinion regarding a person

who was not a plaintiff because the class was not yet certified. Id. at *4. Although the court in

Evans went on to address a summary judgment motion, the relevant issue in that case was direct

evidence submitted regarding a nonparty in an uncertified class action. Id. Treating a class as



                                              - 10 -
certified for summary judgment purposes—and thus permitting an inference of class-wide injury

from facts in the record—is different from submitting evidence regarding a specific person or

entity that is not a party to the case.

        We pause to note that the timing of class certification is a complex question which

depends on the circumstances of each case. See 3 William B. Rubenstein, Newberg on Class

Actions § 7:8 at 38 (5th ed. 2013) (“Given that policy concerns cut different ways in different

circumstances, a court’s decision to consider dispositive motions before or after a ruling on class

certification depends greatly on the individual circumstances of the particular case.”); id. § 7:10

at 48-58 (discussing factors to evaluate timing of class certification to summary judgment). Our

conclusion in this case should not be read as an endorsement of delayed class certification. We

accord great deference to a Superior Court justice’s decision to certify a class. DeCesare v.

Lincoln Benefit Life Co., 852 A.2d 474, 487-88 (R.I. 2004) (“A trial court’s decision to certify a

class is accorded great deference and will not be disturbed unless the trial court misconceived

material evidence, substantially abused its discretion or was otherwise clearly wrong.”). Given

the long duration of this case, however, we must remind the parties that Rule 23(c)(1) of the

Superior Court Rules of Civil Procedure contains a timeliness requirement. See Zarrella v.

Minnesota Mutual Life Insurance Co., 824 A.2d 1249, 1262 n.16 (R.I. 2003) (discussing

timeliness requirement). While we previously have looked to Rule 23 of the Federal Rules of

Civil Procedure for interpretative guidance, we also note that this state has not adopted the 2003

amendments to the federal rule, with its more liberal timeliness requirement. Compare Super. R.

Civ. P. 23(c)(1) (“As soon as practicable after the commencement of an action brought as a class

action, the court shall determine by order whether it is to be so maintained.”), with Fed. R. Civ.

P. 23(c)(1)(A) (“At an early practicable time after a person sues or is sued as a class



                                              - 11 -
representative, the court must determine by order whether to certify the action as a class

action.”). But cf. 3 Rubenstein, § 7:5 at 24 (“By excising the ‘as soon as’ formulation, the new

language gives courts more time to address certification, bringing the rule in line with what had

become a de facto practice even under the older, more urgent language.”).

                                            Analysis

                                                I

                               Motion for Summary Judgment

                                          Negligence

       In count 2 of the complaint, plaintiffs allege that Dell breached its duty “to properly

calculate and collect sales tax * * * due on purchases made by Rhode Island residents and

businesses.” The defendants argue that no such duty exists, and, therefore, the Superior Court

justice properly granted summary judgment to defendants on count 2.

       “To properly set forth a claim for negligence, a plaintiff must establish a legally

cognizable duty owed by a defendant to a plaintiff, a breach of that duty, proximate causation

between the conduct and the resulting injury, and the actual loss or damage.” Brown v. Stanley,

84 A.3d 1157, 1161-62 (R.I. 2014) (quoting Willis v. Omar, 954 A.2d 126, 129 (R.I. 2008)). If a

defendant does not owe a legal duty to the plaintiff, then the defendant cannot be liable for

negligence. Id. at 1162.

       “It is well settled that ‘[w]hether a defendant is under a legal duty in a given case is a

question of law.’” Brown, 84 A.3d at 1162 (quoting Willis, 954 A.2d at 129). We assess the

question of legal duty on a case-by-case basis, and we examine “all relevant factors, including

the relationship of the parties, the scope and burden of the obligation to be imposed upon the




                                             - 12 -
defendant, public policy considerations, and notions of fairness.” Gushlaw v. Milner, 42 A.3d
1245, 1252 (R.I. 2012) (quoting Volpe v. Gallagher, 821 A.2d 699, 705 (R.I. 2003)).

       The provision of the General Laws that imposes a sales tax provides that a tax “is

imposed upon sales at retail” and “is paid to the tax administrator by the retailer at the time and

in the manner provided.” G.L. 1956 § 44-18-18. The state further effectuates the payment of

taxes by retailers through a number of penalties for failure to properly remit sales taxes to the

state. See, e.g., G.L. 1956 § 44-19-12 (10 percent penalty for deficiency “due to negligence or

intentional disregard of [sales and use tax provisions]”); § 44-19-31 (A retailer may be, “in

addition to any other penalties in this chapter or elsewhere prescribed, guilty of a felony,

punishment for which is a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or imprisonment

for one year, or both.”).     Thus, the retailer’s duty with regard to the tax is to the tax

administrator, not the consumer.

       The plaintiffs contend that G.L. 1956 § 44-18.1-26, entitled “Customer refund

procedures,” “constitutes a legislative acknowledgement that Rhode Island law already allow[ed]

a purchaser to seek a return of over-collected sales or use tax from the seller.” Section 44-18.1-

26 provides:

                      “Customer refund procedures.

                       “(A) These customer refund procedures are provided to
               apply when a state allows a purchaser to seek a return of over-
               collected sales or use taxes from the seller.

                       “(B) Nothing in this section shall either require a state to
               provide, or prevent a state from providing, a procedure by which a
               purchaser may seek a refund directly from the state arising out of
               sales or use taxes collected in error by a seller from the purchaser.
               Nothing in this section shall operate to extend any person’s time to
               seek a refund of sales or use taxes collected or remitted in error.

                      “(C) These customer refund procedures provide the first
               course of remedy available to purchasers seeking a return of over-

                                              - 13 -
               collected sales or use taxes from the seller. A cause of action
               against the seller for the over-collected sales or use taxes does not
               accrue until a purchaser has provided written notice to a seller and
               the seller has had sixty days to respond. Such notice to the seller
               must contain the information necessary to determine the validity of
               the request.

                       “(D) In connection with a purchaser’s request from a seller
               of over-collected sales or use taxes, a seller shall be presumed to
               have a reasonable business practice, if in the collection of such
               sales or use taxes, the seller: (i) uses either a provider or a system,
               including a proprietary system, that is certified by the state; and (ii)
               has remitted to the state all taxes collected less any deductions,
               credits, or collection allowances.”

This provision—a section of the uniform Streamlined Sales And Use Tax Agreement—does not

apply to this case, the events of which took place in 2000, because it was not enacted until 2006

and became effective in 2007. See P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 30, §§ 12, 21. Even if § 44-18.1-26

did apply, it merely provides a procedural mechanism to seek recovery; the act did not establish

a new legal tort duty.11

       The public policy of the state is to collect taxes that are due and owing. As discussed

above, the General Assembly has chosen to compel retailers to collect the appropriate amount of

taxes by imposing penalties for failure to remit the proper amount of sales tax. If this Court

recognized the duty proposed by plaintiffs, the result would be an opposing incentive to under-

collect sales taxes when the tax law is unclear. This, in turn, would lead to a decrease in the

amount of taxes collected by the state, in contravention of the state’s interest in receiving

revenue.   Furthermore, the over-collection of sales taxes by retailers is rarely a problem.

Retailers are under economic pressure to minimize the total price paid by the consumer. A

charge of more sales tax than required typically serves no business purpose—it increases the


11
   Notably, plaintiffs did not follow the requisite procedure by providing the written notice
required in G.L. 1956 § 44-18.1-26(C); this is understandable, however, because the statute did
not exist at the time.
                                                - 14 -
price to consumers (thus making them less likely to buy the product), and it does not increase the

profits of the businesses because the money collected is simply remitted to the state.

           Finally, notions of fairness also favor our conclusion that a retailer does not owe a duty

to consumers to properly collect sales tax. As discussed above, retailers already owe a duty to

the state and are subject to penalties for under-collection. It would be untenable to make retailers

subject to state penalties for under-collection and civil suit for over-collection. Such a policy

would force retailers to be perfectly accurate in their tax calculations or face legal action. Given

the complexity of tax law, which is rife with nuance and exceptions, it would be unfair to subject

retailers to this additional duty.

        Accordingly, we are satisfied that defendants did not owe a legal duty to plaintiffs

regarding the collection of taxes, and therefore plaintiffs cannot establish the tort of negligence.

The Superior Court justice properly granted defendants’ motion for summary judgment as to

count 2.

                                     Deceptive Trade Practices Act

        The heart of this case is plaintiffs’ DTPA claim.         The plaintiffs allege that Dell’s

collection of sales tax on service contracts constituted an unfair and deceptive trade practice

under the DTPA. Dell argues that its practice of charging sales tax was neither unfair nor

deceptive and that it was merely following its understanding of Rhode Island tax law at the time.

The Superior Court justice granted summary judgment to defendants on plaintiffs’ DTPA claim.

        The DTPA provides that “unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any trade

or commerce are declared unlawful.” Section 6-13.1-2. To redress such unlawful practices, the

DTPA provides a private right of action to “[a]ny person who purchases or leases goods or

services primarily for personal, family, or household purposes and thereby suffers any



                                                 - 15 -
ascertainable loss of money or property, real or personal * * *.” Section 6-13.1-5.2(a). The

statute also permits a class action. Section 6-13.1-5.2(b). “It is clear that in enacting the DTPA,

the Legislature intended to declare unlawful a broad variety of activities that are unfair or

deceptive, as well as to provide a remedy to consumers who have sustained financial losses as a

result of such activities.” Park v. Ford Motor Co., 844 A.2d 687, 692 (R.I. 2004). Thus, “[t]he

DTPA is a remedial act and it should be liberally construed.” Long, 984 A.2d at 1081.

       This Court has stated that “a plaintiff must establish that he or she is a consumer, and that

defendant is committing or has committed an unfair or deceptive act while engaged in a business

of trade or commerce.” Kelley v. Cowesett Hills Associates, 768 A.2d 425, 431 (R.I. 2001). In

the DTPA, the General Assembly provided interpretive guidance by declaring that “due

consideration and great weight shall be given to the interpretations of the federal trade

commission and the federal courts relating to § 5(a) of the Federal Trade Commission Act.”

Section 6-13.1-3. Different analyses have developed regarding what constitutes an “unfair”

practice and a “deceptive” practice, and we discuss them seriatim.

                                            1. Unfair

       To determine whether a trade practice is “unfair” under the DTPA, this Court has stated

that the following factors apply:

               “(1) Whether the practice, without necessarily having been
               previously considered unlawful, offends public policy as it has
               been established by statutes, the common law, or otherwise—
               whether, in other words, it is within at least the penumbra of some
               common-law, statutory, or other established concept of unfairness;
               (2) whether it is immoral, unethical, oppressive, or unscrupulous;
               (3) whether it causes substantial injury to consumers (or
               competitors or other businessmen).” Ames v. Oceanside Welding




                                              - 16 -
               and Towing Co., 767 A.2d 677, 681 (R.I. 2001) (quoting FTC v.
               Sperry & Hutchinson Co., 405 U.S. 233, 244-45 n.5 (1972)).12

The plaintiffs need not establish every factor, and they may prove unfairness by showing that a

trade practice meets one factor to a great degree or two or three factors to a lesser degree. See

Cheshire Mortgage Service, Inc. v. Montes, 612 A.2d 1130, 1143-44 (Conn. 1992) (“All three

criteria do not need to be satisfied to support a finding of unfairness. A practice may be unfair

because of the degree to which it meets one of the criteria or because to a lesser extent it meets

all three.”) (quoting Statement of Basis and Purpose, Disclosure Requirements and Prohibitions

Concerning Franchising and Business Opportunity Ventures, 43 Fed. Reg. 59,614 and 59,635

(1978)).




12
   The Superior Court justice applied these factors, and both parties present their DTPA
arguments in their briefs by applying these factors. Therefore, we will apply these factors here.
Nevertheless, we pause to note that the Federal Trade Commission (FTC) adjusted its
interpretation of unfairness in a 1980 Policy Statement. See FTC Policy Statement on
Unfairness, appended to In re International Harvester Co., 104 F.T.C. 949, 1070 (1984).
Additionally, in 1994, Congress further defined the FTC’s role in determining an unfair trade
practice:

                      “Standard of proof; public policy considerations

                       “The Commission shall have no authority under this section
               or section 57a of this title to declare unlawful an act or practice on
               the grounds that such act or practice is unfair unless the act or
               practice causes or is likely to cause substantial injury to consumers
               which is not reasonably avoidable by consumers themselves and
               not outweighed by countervailing benefits to consumers or to
               competition. In determining whether an act or practice is unfair,
               the Commission may consider established public policies as
               evidence to be considered with all other evidence. Such public
               policy considerations may not serve as a primary basis for such
               determination.” 15 U.S.C. § 45(n).

What effect the FTC’s 1980 policy statement and 15 U.S.C. § 45(n) have on the unfairness
analysis is not before us.

                                               - 17 -
       Addressing the first factor, the Superior Court justice concluded that Dell’s collection of

sales tax on a nontaxable item offended public policy. We agree. Statutes passed by the

Legislature are the state’s declaration of public policy. Thus, acting in contravention of those

laws, as Dell clearly did, violates public policy.13

       Regarding the second factor, the Superior Court justice concluded that Dell’s actions

were not “immoral, unethical, oppressive, or unscrupulous.” The Superior Court justice accepted

Dell’s argument that “the charge of sales tax on the optional service contract sold to Ricci was a

good faith, reasonable interpretation of the tax law and regulations in effect.” Further, he stated

that “Dell’s honest misinterpretation of a delicate area of the state tax law cannot be held to be an

unfair act.” Dell takes this conclusion even a step further in its brief by arguing that the DTPA

requires evidence of bad faith. This is incorrect. The DTPA does not require a showing of bad

faith. It only requires an “unfair or deceptive” act or practice. Section 6-13.1-2. While trade

practices undertaken in bad faith are also likely to be unfair or deceptive, bad faith is not the

statutory standard.14

       Whether Dell’s sales tax calculation and collection practice was in good faith and

resulted in an honest misinterpretation is a question of material fact. Dell certainly can argue to a

jury that it was acting under a good faith interpretation of tax law and therefore its conduct was

not unfair. However, a jury could also draw the inference that Dell’s efforts to avoid its own tax

nexus with Rhode Island unfairly resulted in consumers being charged for taxes that they should


13
   We note that, on appeal, Dell did not challenge the Superior Court justice’s determination that
it was improper for Dell to charge Ricci a tax on the optional service contract.
14
  “Bad faith” is defined as “[t]he malicious intention to be dishonest or to violate the law, as in
negotiations over a contract.” American Heritage Dictionary of the English Language 133 (5th
ed. 2011). Neither “unfair” itself nor its elaborative siblings—immoral, unethical, oppressive, or
unscrupulous—carry a connotation of malice necessary to show “bad faith.”

                                                - 18 -
not have been charged.15 Although taking steps to avoid a tax nexus to the state is not illegal, if

those steps include overcharging consumers in order to achieve that goal, a factfinder can

determine the weight of such evidence on the ultimate question of whether Dell’s trade practice

was unfair under the DTPA.

       Additionally, the record contains internal records from Dell which make clear that Dell

allocated a certain value to the service contracts. Yet, Dell chose not to clearly list that value in

its acknowledgments sent to consumers. Nevertheless, Dell charged a sales tax on only the

service contract value, and not the full purchase price. We note that a consumer could take a

number of steps to figure out the service contract price: on the acknowledgement, the line items

for the service contract include asterisks; the asterisk denotes, “service contract may be subject to

sales tax”; and the first page of the acknowledgment states, “Dell Catalog Sales collects tax only

in FL, KY, NC, NV, TN & TX. For other states the tax shown relates only to 3rd party service

contracts and the buyer is responsible for remitting any additional tax directly to the taxing

authorities.”16 But it is for a jury to decide which inference to draw from Dell’s decision not to

state clearly the service contract price on its acknowledgment.         Indeed, a factfinder could

conclude that Dell deliberately omitted the price of that item, resulting in a tax to the consumer

in order to avoid a tax nexus for its own products. Accordingly, under the second factor in

Ames, a jury could find that Dell’s improper collection of sales tax was immoral, unethical,

oppressive, or unscrupulous. See Ames, 767 A.2d at 681; see also Long, 984 A.2d at 1081


15
   Dell did not have a tax nexus to Rhode Island and therefore was not registered with the
Department of Taxation. However, BancTec, a third party contractor that serviced Dell products
under optional service contracts purchased by Dell’s customers, did have a tax nexus to Rhode
Island. Under agreements between Dell and BancTec, Dell was required to collect any
applicable sales and use tax on BancTec’s behalf.
16
  It was this combination of information that led the letter ruling to conclude that the service
contract price was, in fact, separately stated for tax collection purposes.
                                               - 19 -
(noting liberal construction of DTPA); Park, 844 A.2d at 692 (noting legislative intent “to

declare unlawful a broad variety of activities that are unfair or deceptive”).

       Regarding the third factor, the Superior Court questioned whether Ricci’s $16.31 loss

constituted a substantial injury. Our conclusion regarding the standard of review becomes

crucially important on this point. If the only injury to be considered in the light most favorable

to plaintiff was $16.31, we may well agree with the Superior Court justice. However, because

we treat the class as certified for purposes of drawing reasonable inferences in favor of the

nonmoving party, and viewing evidence in the most favorable light to the nonmoving party, we

will consider the evidence in the record of potential injury to the class. Chavers, 844 A.2d at 679

n.12. The record contains multiple claims filed with the tax administrator for refunds of sales

taxes remitted by multiple defendants. Dell Marketing LP claimed a refund of $900,000 for the

period October 1, 2001 to December 31, 2003. BancTec, Inc. claimed a refund of $540,454 for

the period October 1, 2001 to December 31, 2003.           QualxServ, LLC claimed a refund of

$145,451.07 for the period January 1, 2002 to October 30, 2004. All of these refund claims were

prepared by the same attorney and all contained an explanation that they were “protective

claim[s]” related to the outcome of this litigation. Accordingly, viewing the evidence in the light

most favorable to the nonmoving party, a factfinder could infer an injury of over $1 million to

the class. An injury of such monetary magnitude certainly qualifies as substantial.17



17
  The dissent draws a distinction between treating the plaintiff class as certified for purposes of
summary judgment (on which the dissent takes no position) and aggregating the damages of the
plaintiff class (on which the dissent disagrees). First, we reiterate that the aggregation to which
the dissent refers is not automatic or culled out of thin air; an inference of class-wide injury can
be drawn from competent evidence before the trial justice. Regardless, if the class is treated as
certified, for purposes of viewing the evidence in the light most favorable to the nonmoving
party on summary judgment, an inference of class-wide injury should be drawn when competent
evidence permits. Under the dissent’s view, a named plaintiff in a class action must provide
evidence that he or she individually suffered “substantial” injury by a trade practice of the
                                               - 20 -
       Therefore, a factfinder could conclude that Dell’s sales tax calculation and collection

practice offended public policy, was immoral, unethical, oppressive, or unscrupulous, and caused

substantial injury to consumers. Given that all three factors could weigh in favor of plaintiffs, a

factfinder could conclude that the trade practice was unfair under the DTPA.

                                          2. Deceptive

       Although this Court has not defined a “deceptive” act or practice under the DTPA, we are

statutorily required to accord great weight to the FTC’s interpretation of § 5(a) of the Federal

Trade Commission Act, and therefore we adopt that standard. Section 6-13.1-3. Therefore, to

prove that a trade practice is deceptive under the DTPA, a plaintiff must set forth three elements:

“[1] a representation, omission, or practice, that [2] is likely to mislead consumers acting

reasonably under the circumstances, and [3], the representation, omission, or practice is

material.”18 F.T.C. v. Verity International, Ltd., 443 F.3d 48, 63 (2d Cir. 2006) (quoting In re

Cliffdale Associates, Inc., 103 F.T.C. 110, 165 (1984)). “The deception need not be made with

intent to deceive; it is enough that the representations or practices were likely to mislead

consumers acting reasonably.” Id.

       The Superior Court justice found that “Dell represented that there was sales tax,

misleading the consumers who paid the tax,” but that the sales tax portion of the purchase price

was not material under the DTPA because it had no effect on Ricci’s choice to purchase the

product. Thus, the Superior Court justice found that Dell’s sales tax collection practice was not

deceptive under the DTPA. The plaintiffs argue that Dell’s trade practice was material because it

defendant. This confounds the injury-in-fact requirement for standing—which is satisfied by
Ricci’s $16.31 injury—and the substantial injury prong of the DTPA analysis, and effectively
eliminates the possibility of a class action under the DTPA surviving summary judgment prior to
certification.
18
  The Superior Court justice applied this standard, and neither party on appeal suggests that
another standard should apply.
                                              - 21 -
affected how much Ricci would have to pay. Dell argues that charging the tax was not likely to

mislead consumers, and it was not material.

       We agree with the Superior Court justice that Dell’s charge of the sales tax was a

representation likely to mislead consumers acting reasonably under the circumstances. Dell

represented that there was a sales tax on the service contract. That representation misled Ricci to

pay the sales tax, when none was in fact due.

       Regarding the third element, a representation is material if it “involves information that is

important to consumers and, hence, likely to affect their choice of, or conduct regarding, a

product.” F.T.C. v. Patriot Alcohol Testers, Inc., 798 F. Supp. 851, 855 (D. Mass. 1992)

(quoting Cliffdale Associates, Inc., 103 F.T.C. at 165). Importantly for this case, “[e]xpress

representations that are shown to be false are presumptively material.” Id. (citing Cliffdale

Associates, Inc., 103 F.T.C. at 168, 182). Here, Dell made the express representation that sales

tax was due on the service contract portion of Ricci’s purchase. But that representation was

false. Therefore, Dell’s representation presumptively is material.

       Dell points out that Ricci testified in her deposition that she was most concerned with the

bottom-line price rather than the amount of the sales tax. And if she had properly been charged,

i.e., charged no tax, the price would have been lower, thus making her more likely to buy the

product.   Nevertheless, on summary judgment, these factors are insufficient to rebut the

presumption of a material misrepresentation. Viewing the evidence in the light most favorable to

plaintiff, the proper amount of sales tax is “information that is important to consumers,” and

defendants’ trade practice affected plaintiffs’ conduct regarding the product—the total price paid

for it. See Patriot Alcohol Testers, Inc., 798 F. Supp. at 855 (quoting Cliffdale Associates, Inc.,




                                                - 22 -
103 F.T.C. at 165). Accordingly, a factfinder could conclude that the practice was deceptive

under the DTPA.

       Because a factfinder could conclude that Dell’s practice of charging sales tax on service

contracts was unfair or deceptive under the DTPA, we vacate the grant of summary judgment on

count 1 of the complaint.

                        Requests for Injunctive and Declaratory Relief

       In Long, 984 A.2d at 1078, we noted that “plaintiffs conceded that Mr. Long could not

bring a DTPA claim because his purchase was made for a business purpose.”                    We also

acknowledged that the Superior Court justice dismissed Long’s claims to “the extent he sought

damages arising from Dell’s alleged negligence,” but that “[i]t is possible that Mr. Long may

have a claim for equitable or declaratory relief—an issue that is not before us.” Id. at 1078 n.8.

In the case at bar, the Superior Court justice addressed the issue of equitable relief on summary

judgment, and he found that “[p]laintiffs’ prayer that the Court enjoin [d]efendants from

collecting the allegedly improper taxes is moot, as Dell no longer collects [such taxes].”

       The plaintiffs here allege only two counts—DTPA and negligence. Long’s concession

that he has no DTPA claim because he purchased his computer for business purposes, Long, 984

A.2d at 1078, and our conclusion herein that summary judgment properly was granted on the

negligence count, signal the end to Long’s case because neither cause of action remains.

       An injunction is a remedy, not a cause of action. See Thompson v. JPMorgan Chase

Bank, N.A., No. 13-2230, 2014 WL 1586992, at *1 n.1 (6th Cir. Apr. 22, 2014) (“‘Injunctive

relief’ is not a cause of action, it is a remedy.”); Koufos v. U.S. Bank, N.A., 939 F. Supp. 2d 40,

46 (D. Mass. 2013) (“An injunction is not a cause of action, but a remedy.”); see also Davis v.

Passman, 442 U.S. 228, 239-40 n.18 (1979) (noting that a “cause of action is a question of



                                               - 23 -
whether a particular plaintiff is a member of the class of litigants that may, as a matter of law,

appropriately invoke the power of the court; and relief is a question of the various remedies a

federal court may make available”). Because Long has no underlying cause of action remaining,

he has no right to seek the remedy of injunctive relief. Furthermore, the request for declaratory

relief in the complaint requested a declaration that Dell’s practices were unfair or deceptive

under the DTPA, were unlawful under the DTPA, and were breaches of Dell’s duty to properly

calculate and collect sales tax. Because that request for declaratory relief relates solely to

underlying rights or causes of action unavailable to Long, he may not pursue a declaratory

judgment.    Accordingly, the Superior Court justice properly dismissed Long’s requests for

declaratory and injunctive relief.     Ricci, however, may be entitled to seek declaratory or

injunctive relief because, as discussed above, her DTPA claim survives, and “[t]he DTPA

provides a private right of action to recover * * * equitable relief for violations of its provisions.”

Long, 984 A.2d at 1080-81 (quoting Chavers, 844 A.2d at 670).

                                                  II

                                          Motion to Strike

       In a separate appeal, the tax administrator challenges the Superior Court justice’s grant of

a motion to strike the tax administrator’s affirmative defenses. The Superior Court justice struck

the defenses as immaterial under Rule 12(f) of the Superior Court Rules of Civil Procedure

because no claims had been asserted against the tax administrator, and because the conditions

precedent to the allegedly conditional defenses had not arisen in this case. The tax administrator

argues that his affirmative defenses improperly were stricken.

       Our discussion begins by addressing the standard of review; this Court has yet to declare

the standard under which we will review a motion to strike in accordance with Rule 12(f). The



                                                - 24 -
plaintiffs contend that this Court should review a grant of a motion to strike for an abuse of

discretion. The tax administrator argues that the standard of review is de novo.

       Rule 12(f) provides: “the court may order stricken from any pleading any insufficient

defense, or any redundant, immaterial, impertinent, or scandalous matter.” This Court has stated

that, “where the Federal rule and our state rule are substantially similar, we will look to the

Federal courts for guidance or interpretation of our own rule.” Heal v. Heal, 762 A.2d 463, 466-

67 (R.I. 2000) (citing Smith v. Johns-Manville Corp., 489 A.2d 336 (R.I. 1985)). Rule 12(f) of

the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure is nearly identical to our state rule. See Fed. R. Civ. P.

12(f) (“The court may strike from a pleading an insufficient defense or any redundant,

immaterial, impertinent, or scandalous matter.”).

       Federal circuit courts hold that the standard of review of a Rule 12(f) motion to strike is

abuse of discretion. See, e.g., Branch Banking and Trust Co. v. Lichty Bros. Construction, Inc.,

488 F. App’x 430, 434 n.2 (11th Cir. 2012) (“We review a district court’s decision to strike any

defenses that are insufficient as a matter of law for abuse of discretion.”); Whittlestone, Inc. v.

Handi-Craft Co., 618 F.3d 970, 974 (9th Cir. 2010) (noting that “Rule 12(f) motions are

reviewed for ‘abuse of discretion’”) (quoting Nurse v. United States, 226 F.3d 996, 1000 (9th

Cir. 2000)); Cambridge Toxicology Group, Inc. v. Exnicios, 495 F.3d 169, 178 (5th Cir. 2007)

(“This court reviews a motion to strike for abuse of discretion.”); Hatchett v. United States, 330
F.3d 875, 887 (6th Cir. 2003) (“We review the grant of a motion to strike a pleading for abuse of

discretion.”); Nationwide Insurance Co. v. Century Missouri Electric Cooperative, Inc., 278 F.3d
742, 748 (8th Cir. 2001) (“Because a district court enjoys liberal discretion under Rule 12(f), * *

* we review this claim for an abuse of discretion.”). Therefore, we will review this motion to

strike under the abuse of discretion standard.



                                                 - 25 -
       This is not a tax case, as we already have stated:

               “This is a negligence action coupled with a claim alleging
               deceptive trade practices. Here, the gravamen of plaintiffs’
               complaint is whether Dell (not the tax administrator) committed a
               deceptive trade practice by collecting taxes on the purchase of
               optional service contracts. The plaintiffs argue that these service
               contracts are not taxable in Rhode Island and that Dell, not the tax
               administrator, ignored the relevant statutes and regulations when it
               collected the tax. The fact that Dell may have paid over the money
               to the Division of Taxation does not change this result.” Long, 984
               A.2d at 1080.

This case is about allegedly unfair or deceptive trade practices brought against Dell under the

DTPA. While tax issues are implicated by the nature of plaintiffs’ DTPA claim, no party has

filed a claim against the tax administrator in this case. Although some defendants have filed

“protective” claims for refunds with the tax administrator, those claims are, or may become,

separate cases with different standards and can be reviewed under the appropriate procedures

when (or if) a decision in the case before us is made adverse to Dell. Because there are no

claims against the tax administrator, there is nothing for the tax administrator to raise as an

affirmative defense.

       Furthermore, the tax administrator’s intervention in this case was limited; the Superior

Court justice permitted the tax administrator to intervene “for the purpose of appearing and being

heard on the issues of subject-matter jurisdiction, the proper interpretation and construction of

tax regulations and statutes, and the application and constitutional validity of tax statutes.” This

Court already has decided the subject-matter jurisdiction issue, and there is no challenge to the

constitutional validity of the tax statutes. Thus, although the tax administrator may still appear

and be heard on the proper interpretation, construction, and application of tax regulations and

statutes, to the extent that these issues become germane, he may not defend against claims that

are illusory in the context of this case. The maintenance of these affirmative defenses only


                                               - 26 -
distracts the parties from the real remaining issue in this case—whether Dell’s practice of

collecting sales tax on service contracts was an unfair or deceptive trade practice.

       We pause to note that the tax administrator cannot be collaterally estopped from raising

any defenses that he was precluded from asserting in this case. The resolution of the tax refund

claims is a separate matter. If a party files a claim against the tax administrator in this case,

obviously, he may file an answer and assert affirmative defenses appropriate for the claims

asserted. But unless and until that time comes, the tax administrator’s affirmative defenses are

immaterial. See Super. R. Civ. P. 12(f). Accordingly, the Superior Court justice did not abuse

his discretion by striking the tax administrator’s affirmative defenses.

                                            Conclusion

       For the reasons set forth in this opinion, we affirm the Superior Court justice’s rulings on

count 2, negligence, and the declaratory and injunctive relief claims.         We also affirm the

Superior Court justice’s order striking the tax administrator’s affirmative defenses. However, we

vacate the Superior Court justice’s ruling on count 1 (DTPA), and we remand the case to the

Superior Court.




                                               - 27 -
       Justice Robinson, concurring in part and dissenting in part. I am pleased to be able

to concur with the majority’s ruling concerning: (1) its affirmance of the Superior Court’s grant

of summary judgment in Dell’s favor on count 2 of the complaint (negligence); (2) its affirmance

of the Superior Court’s dismissal of the requests of plaintiff Nicholas T. Long for injunctive and

declaratory relief; and (3) its affirmance of the Superior Court’s granting of plaintiffs’ motion to

strike the tax administrator’s affirmative defenses. However, as for the majority’s vacating the

Superior Court’s granting of Dell’s motion for summary judgment on count 1 of the complaint

(alleging violation of the Deceptive Trade Practices Act), I must respectfully, but very

vigorously, record my dissent. Taking into account settled principles of law as well as the plain

meaning of the following words—immoral, unethical, oppressive, unscrupulous, and material—I

am convinced that no reasonable jury could conclude that Dell violated the Deceptive Trade

Practices Act (DTPA).

       I have on several prior occasions insisted on (and I remain committed to) the principle

that the courts should be chary about too unreflectingly disposing of cases pursuant to Rule 56 of

the Superior Court Rules of Civil Procedure. See, e.g., DeMaio v. Ciccone, 59 A.3d 125, 129

(R.I. 2013); Pichardo v. Stevens, 55 A.3d 762, 765-66 (R.I. 2012); Employers Mutual Casualty

Co. v. Arbella Protection Insurance Co., 24 A.3d 544, 553 (R.I. 2011); Shelter Harbor

Conservation Society, Inc. v. Rogers, 21 A.3d 337, 346 (R.I. 2011).

       However, being “chary” in that regard is not the equivalent of rendering Rule 56 entirely

nugatory. In my judgment, there is absolutely nothing in the record before us that would justify

a reasonable jury rendering a verdict for Ms. Ricci; and, as such, I am of the decided opinion that

the hearing justice did not err when he granted Dell’s motion for summary judgment on Ms.

Ricci’s DTPA claim. Because the DTPA is violated if a practice is either “unfair or deceptive,” I



                                               - 28 -
shall address the majority’s opinion as to each of those terms seriatim. See G.L. 1956 § 6-13.1-2

(“Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any

trade or commerce are declared unlawful.”) (emphasis added).

       With respect to whether or not Dell’s actions in the instant case could be found by a

reasonable jury to have been unfair, I most particularly take issue with the majority’s

determination that it is possible for a reasonable jury to find such actions “immoral, unethical,

oppressive, or unscrupulous.” Ames v. Oceanside Welding and Towing Co., 767 A.2d 677, 681

(R.I. 2001) (internal quotation marks omitted). One need only look to the definitions of those

terms to determine that Dell’s actions simply do not fall within their scope.1 “Immoral” is

defined as “[c]ontrary to established moral principles.” The American Heritage Dictionary of the

English Language 879 (5th ed. 2011). “Unethical” is obviously the antonym of “ethical,” which

is defined as “[b]eing in accordance with the accepted principles of right and wrong that govern

the conduct of a profession * * * .” Id. at 610. “Oppressive” conduct is that which involves

“[e]xercising power arbitrarily and often unjustly;” it is further defined as “tyrannical” and

“[d]ifficult to cope with; causing hardship or depressed spirits * * * .” Id. at 1237. Finally, an



1
        I note that this Court has on numerous occasions, in past opinions, relied on dictionary
definitions to provide the plain meaning of certain words. See, e.g., Olamuyiwa v. Zebra
Atlantek, Inc., 45 A.3d 527, 535 (R.I. 2012) (“It is well established that [w]hen * * * a statute
does not define a word, courts will often apply a common meaning as provided by a recognized
dictionary.”) (internal quotation marks omitted); Palin v. Palin, 41 A.3d 248, 250 n. 3, 251 n. 5
(R.I. 2012) (defining “aesthetics” and “[c]osmetology”); Drs. Pass and Bertherman, Inc. v.
Neighborhood Health Plan of Rhode Island, 31 A.3d 1263, 1269 (R.I. 2011) (“This meaning is
consistent with the common sense, dictionary definition of ‘public’ with respect to
expenditures.”); In re Proposed Town of New Shoreham Project, 25 A.3d 482, 513 (R.I. 2011)
(“When, as is the case here, a statute does not define a word, courts will often apply a common
meaning as provided by a recognized dictionary.”) (internal quotation marks omitted). Indeed,
not only does the majority opinion rely on a dictionary definition in footnote 14, but it actually
relies on the same dictionary from which I have extracted the definitions on which I base my
dissent.


                                              - 29 -
action done “unscrupulous[ly]” is done in a manner “[h]aving or showing no regard for what is

right or honorable; devoid of scruples.” Id. at 1899.

        After my review of the record and my consideration of the just-quoted definitions, I am in

complete agreement with the hearing justice’s statement that “Dell’s honest misinterpretation of

a delicate area of the state tax law cannot be held [by a reasonable jury] to be an unfair act.” In

my respectful but unblinking view, it defies common sense to contend that charging too much

tax, in an effort to comply with (somewhat confusing)2 state tax regulations, is somehow

contrary to moral principles or is an arbitrary exercise of power. It defies logic even further to

contend that Dell’s actions were “tyrannical” or done with “no regard for what is right or

honorable.” It is clear to me beyond a peradventure that Dell was attempting to charge the

appropriate tax in order to do what was right, honorable, ethical, and moral—namely, to pay the

state of Rhode Island what it believed to be the appropriate amount of sales tax.

        The majority opinion states that, while Dell can argue that it was operating under a “good

faith interpretation of tax law,” a jury could also infer that “Dell’s efforts to avoid its own tax

nexus with Rhode Island unfairly resulted in consumers being charged for taxes that they should

not have been charged.” Contrary to the stance adopted by my colleagues in the majority, I am

completely unable to perceive any evidence presented by Ms. Ricci suggesting that Dell’s

actions were anything other than a “good faith interpretation of tax law.” It is a settled legal

principle that the party against whom a motion for summary judgment has been filed “must do

more than simply show that there is some metaphysical doubt as to the material facts.”

Matsushita Electric Industrial Co. v. Zenith Radio Corp., 475 U.S. 574, 586 (1986). “The mere

2
        I note that the interpretation of the tax regulations at issue was not fully clear until a letter
ruling was obtained from the Division of Taxation on March 16, 2005—approximately five years
after Ms. Ricci bought her Dell computer and the service contract, which form the basis of the
instant case.
                                                 - 30 -
existence of a scintilla of evidence in support of the [non-moving party’s] position will be

insufficient; there must be evidence on which the jury could reasonably find for the [non-moving

party].”    Anderson v. Liberty Lobby, Inc., 477 U.S. 242, 252 (1986); see also Classic

Entertainment & Sports, Inc. v. Pemberton, 988 A.2d 847, 849 (R.I. 2010) (“In opposing a

motion for summary judgment, the nonmoving party carries the burden of proving by competent

evidence the existence of a disputed issue of material fact and cannot rest on allegations or

denials in the pleadings or on conclusions or legal opinions.”) (internal quotation marks omitted).

Ms. Ricci has failed to provide even such a “scintilla” of evidence; there is nothing in the record

on which a reasonable jury could determine that Dell was acting in any way nefariously or

underhandedly. Thus, summary judgment in Dell’s favor, even where the issue of intent was

arguably involved, was proper. See Medina-Munoz v. R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Co., 896 F.2d 5, 8

(1st Cir. 1990) (“Even in cases where elusive concepts such as motive or intent are at issue,

summary judgment may be appropriate if the non-moving party rests merely upon conclusory

allegations, improbable inferences, and unsupported speculation.”); Meiri v. Dacon, 759 F.2d
989, 998 (2d Cir. 1985) (“The summary judgment rule would be rendered sterile * * * if the

mere incantation of intent or state of mind would operate as a talisman to defeat an otherwise

valid [summary judgment] motion.”); Brule v. Nerac, Inc., 13 A.3d 723, 727 (Conn. App. Ct.

2011) (“Although the determination of whether the parties intended to undertake a contractual

commitment is generally a question of fact * * * when the proposed language could not

reasonably be construed as a basis for a contractual promise, the issue should not be submitted to

the trier of fact.”).

        Moreover, in what I consider to be a further departure from common sense, the majority

perceives a possible deception and unfairness in a practice from which Dell does not profit one



                                              - 31 -
whit. DeFontes v. Dell, Inc., 984 A.2d 1061, 1063 (R.I. 2009) (“There is no allegation that Dell

improperly retained any of the collected tax.”); see State v. Bergevine, 883 A.2d 1158, 1159 (R.I.

2005) (mem.) (“‘That seems to us to be the common sense of the matter; and common sense

often makes good law.’”) (quoting Peak v. United States, 353 U.S. 43, 46 (1957)).

       For the reasons which I have just discussed, I must dissent from the majority’s

determination that a genuine issue of material fact remains with respect to whether Dell’s actions

were immoral, unethical, oppressive, or unscrupulous and, accordingly, unfair.3

       Turning next to the majority’s determination that a reasonable jury could have found

Dell’s actions to be deceptive, even if I were to accept that those actions are considered a

“practice * * * likely to mislead consumers acting reasonably under the circumstances,” I simply

cannot agree that the actions were material—i.e., that they were likely to affect the consumer’s

choice. F.T.C. v. Verity International, Ltd., 443 F.3d 48, 63 (2d Cir. 2006); see F.T.C. v. Patriot

Alcohol Testers, Inc., 798 F. Supp. 851, 855 (D. Mass. 1992). As was helpful in determining

the issue of unfairness, a dictionary definition of “material” provides helpful contextual guidance

in the present circumstance; and I note that “material” is defined as “[b]eing both relevant and

consequential; crucial.” The American Heritage Dictionary of the English Language 1083 (5th

ed. 2011).     Under that definition, even accepting the majority’s statement that false

representations are “‘presumptively material,’” the dearth of evidence tending to show that



3
        I recognize that, for the purposes of analyzing a claim under the DTPA, one is not
necessarily required to prove every factor of the articulated standard. Indeed, the majority
opinion expressly acknowledges that point: “The plaintiffs need not establish every factor, and
they may prove unfairness by showing that a trade practice meets one factor to a great degree or
two or three factors to a lesser degree. See Cheshire Mortgage Service, Inc. v. Montes, 612 A.2d
1130, 1143-44 (Conn. 1992) * * * .” However, in my opinion, Dell’s actions which form the
basis of the DTPA claim at issue in the instant case are so obviously not immoral, unethical,
oppressive, or unscrupulous that I consider that conclusion sufficient to establish that summary
judgment in favor of Dell was appropriate.
                                              - 32 -
Dell’s actions were “relevant and consequential” because they affected a consumer’s choice with

respect to the product overcomes any such presumption. Ms. Ricci testified that she was

concerned only with the full price of the computer and the service contract which she was

purchasing—and not with the amount of tax being applied to her purchase. Therefore, Dell’s act

of charging an amount in taxes that was minimally excessive did not change Ms. Ricci’s decision

to purchase the computer. See Patriot Alcohol Testers, Inc., 798 F. Supp. at 855. As reflected in

Ms. Ricci’s own admission, she was not concerned with the amount of tax being charged.

Ironically, had Dell charged the appropriate amount of tax, the overall price of Ms. Ricci’s

computer would have been lower, not higher, thus giving her a further incentive to purchase the

computer. Therefore, contrary to the majority, I can perceive absolutely no evidence on which a

reasonable jury could find Dell’s actions to be deceptive.

       In conclusion, based on our settled law with respect to summary judgment and the

application of the plain meaning of English words, it is my opinion that the hearing justice acted

appropriately when he determined, in ruling on Dell’s motion for summary judgment, that there

were no genuine issues of material fact and that Dell was entitled to judgment as a matter of law.

See DeMaio, 59 A.3d at 129; see also Leavitt v. Correctional Medical Services, Inc., 645 F.3d
484, 503 (1st Cir. 2011) (stating that “[b]ased on [the previously described] series of events, no

reasonable factfinder could conclude that [an employee of the defendant corporation] acted with

deliberate indifference” and, consequently, affirming a grant of summary judgment in that

employee’s favor); Estate of Frusher v. ABT Associates, Inc., 643 F. Supp. 2d 220, 227 (D.R.I.

2009) (determining that, based on the evidence presented, a reasonable jury could not conclude

that the decedent had an “unsound mind” and, that, therefore, summary judgment was

appropriate); Empire Acquisition Group, LLC v. Atlantic Mortgage Co., 35 A.3d 878, 884 (R.I.



                                              - 33 -
2012) (stating that “if the sequence of events in the case admits of only one reasonable

[disposition], then the court should intervene and resolve the matter as a question of law”)

(internal quotation marks omitted).

       For these reasons, I must respectfully, but very emphatically, dissent.4



4
        I raise a final concern, which, while not an actual basis of my dissent, is a point on which
I find it important to opine. The majority opinion states that, for the purposes of summary
judgment, it will treat the class in the instant case as if it had already been certified—which it has
not been. (I explicitly decline to take a position as to the correctness vel non of that very broad
interpretation of what Rule 56 of the Superior Court Rules of Civil Procedure permits.) As a
consequence of that rather ipse dixit “as if” assumption, when the majority considers whether or
not Ms. Ricci suffered a “substantial injury” for the purpose of determining whether Dell’s
actions were “unfair,” it aggregates the damages suffered by the entire class; it states as follows:

               “If the only injury to be considered in the light most favorable to
               plaintiff was [Ms. Ricci’s injury of] $16.31, we may well agree
               with the Superior Court justice. However, because we treat the
               class as certified for purposes of drawing reasonable inferences in
               favor of the nonmoving party, and viewing evidence in the most
               favorable light, we will consider the evidence in the record of
               potential injury to the class.”

      In my view, the majority’s statement aggregating the damages of the entire class is
completely inconsistent with established law with respect to class actions. One treatise
summarizes as follows the state of American law in this regard:

                      “Named plaintiffs who represent a class must allege and
               show that they personally have been injured, not that injury has
               been suffered by other members of the class that they purportedly
               represent. If a named plaintiff has not been injured by the wrong
               alleged in the complaint, then no case or controversy is presented,
               and the plaintiff has no standing to sue either on his or her own
               behalf or on behalf of a class. A plaintiff without a claim cannot be
               allowed to bring suit by making a class-action allegation. A
               representative cannot adequately represent a class when the
               representative does not state a valid cause of action.” 59
               Am.Jur.2d Parties § 61 at 507 (2012) (footnotes omitted).

It follows (from the just-quoted statement and the cases relied on by defendants, which the
majority disregards—namely, Lewis v. Casey, 518 U.S. 343 (1996); Jackson v. Resolution GGF
Oy, 136 F.3d 1130 (7th Cir. 1998); and Evans v. Taco Bell Corp., CIV. 04CV103JD, 2005 WL
2333841 (D.N.H. Sept. 23, 2005)) that, if a named plaintiff must state a valid claim, including
                                                - 34 -
alleging an injury, then in a rare case like the one before us (where the amount of injury is a
factor in meeting the requirements to prove the claim alleged), the named plaintiff must also
individually meet those requirements.
        I look to the 2003 Advisory Committee’s Notes to Rule 23 of the Federal Rules of Civil
Procedure, which, in addressing factors that could affect the timing of a class certification
decision, stated: “The party opposing the class may prefer to win dismissal or summary
judgment as to the individual plaintiffs without certification and without binding the class that
might have been certified.” See also 3 William B. Rubenstein, Newberg on Class Actions § 7:10
at 50 (2013); cf. 6A Federal Procedure, § 12:284 at 396 (Lawyers Ed. 2004) (stating that the
failure by a district court to address the class action issue on a Fed. R. Civ. P. 12(b)(6) motion to
dismiss “does limit the scope of the court of appeals’ judgment in that, because no class of
plaintiff or defendants is certified, * * * the plaintiffs’ claims must be treated as being brought
solely by the named plaintiffs against the named defendants”). The statement in the Advisory
Committee Notes clearly contemplates that, when a motion for summary judgment is brought
prior to the certification of the class, the motion for summary judgment is, with respect to the
individual claims of the named plaintiffs, not those of the entire class. I further note that, in
arguing to the contrary, the majority opinion cites to only one legal source in the paragraph that it
devotes to the issue of “substantial injury;” that source does not discuss and is not relevant to the
issue of “substantial injury.” In fact, the majority opinion does not cite to any direct source
anywhere in support of its apparent conclusion that, if a class were to be treated as having been
certified for the purposes of summary judgment, the damages could then be aggregated.
        Moreover, the majority’s holding muddies the waters with respect to who is bound by a
Superior Court’s grant of summary judgment in a defendant’s favor prior to a ruling on class
certification. See 6A Federal Procedure, § 12:276 at 377 (stating the typical rule that, if a motion
for summary judgment is “granted before a class is certified, the ruling binds only the individual
parties”); see also id. § 12:404 at 561 (“A summary judgment entered in favor of the party
opposing a class will not bind absent class members * * * prior to a class action determination.
However, if a summary judgment is granted to the party opposing the class after the class has
been certified * * * the judgment will have classwide res judicata effect on all those class
members who do not opt out of the class upon being provided with notice.”).
        For the foregoing reasons, it is my opinion that, in accordance with the law on class
actions and irrespective of the majority’s having, for the purposes of summary judgment, treated
the class as having been certified, the named plaintiff representing the class must individually
meet the requirements for stating a claim under the DTPA, including (as one factor) whether he
or she sustained a “substantial injury.”
        In order to make clear my exact line of reasoning, I reiterate that I explicitly decline to
opine on the propriety of the majority’s decision to treat the plaintiff class as if it had been
certified. For that reason, I need not contend with Chavers v. Fleet Bank (RI), N.A., 844 A.2d
666 (R.I. 2004), which is cited by the majority. The opinion in Chavers is used by the majority
only to support its decision to treat the plaintiff class as having been certified; Chavers does not
support, and indeed could not support, the portion of the majority opinion with which I take
issue; my point, succinctly stated, is that the majority errs in aggregating the damages of the
potential plaintiff class, regardless of whether or not the majority treats the plaintiff class as
having been certified.
                                               - 35 -
                            RHODE ISLAND SUPREME COURT CLERK’S OFFICE

                                  Clerk’s Office Order/Opinion Cover Sheet




TITLE OF CASE:        Nicholas T. Long et al. v. Dell, Inc., et al.

CASE NO:              No. 2012-248-Appeal.
                      No. 2012-249-Appeal.
                      (PB 03-2636)

COURT:                Supreme Court

DATE OPINION FILED: June 27, 2014

JUSTICES:             Suttell, C.J., Goldberg, Flaherty, Robinson, and Indeglia, JJ.

WRITTEN BY:           Associate Justice Maureen McKenna Goldberg

SOURCE OF APPEAL:     Providence County Superior Court

JUDGE FROM LOWER COURT:

                      Associate Justice Michael A. Silverstein

ATTORNEYS ON APPEAL:

                      For Plaintiffs: Joseph Makalusky, Pro Hac Vice
                                      Edward Rapacki, Pro Hac Vice

                      For Defendants: John Shope, Pro Hac Vice
                                      Bernard J. Lemos, Esq., Intervenor














































 



Nicholas T Long, Providence, RI | Spoke











































LOGIN



REGISTER








Add Company



Add Person



Add Topic




Login






Or



















Home | Companies | Nicholas T Long


Advanced Search
FAQ




Javascript is disabled












Summary
EDIT












Nicholas T Long


Alias or tagline




Offices of Lawyers




Providence, RI





Find other companies named Nicholas T Long


General Info


Add Creation Date



Privately Held



0 to 1M



5 or Less




Add Tags— eg, Finance, Business2Business...



Nicholas T Long doesn’t have a company summary yet. Click ‘[edit]’ to add one and help improve Spoke


Not what you're looking for?
Find other companies named Nicholas T Long on Spoke




EDIT
Offices



(HQ)



155 South Main Street 301



Providence,

RI
02903-2963








155 South Main Street 301



Providence,

RI











401-351-5070



N/A




Digital Info



www.ntlong.com/



N/A



N/A



N/A



N/A



N/A



N/A










People (2)



EDIT

Executives & Featured












John Lindsay


Instructor of Higher Education Law











Nicholas Trott Long


Counsel to the Commissioner of Higher Education








Board, Advisors & Investors

EDIT

Add a Board Member, Advisor, or an Investor







Blogs By Industry Voices




There are currently no Blogs by Industry Voices





Timeline
EDIT


Add an article to your timeline— eg, Product, Funding, Expansion...





Notable Links
EDIT

The links below are powered by Bing search results. Click edit to customize.





Press Releases

There are no press releases for this company.




Videos
EDIT


Add a videofrom youtube or vimeo















Created on May 26, 2011


by Spoke
 







Edited on May 26, 2011


by Spoke
 




PAGE COMPLETION

25%




Linked a Person




Industry




Website/Blog




Add a Social Network



Add 3 Notable Links



Add a Summary



Add a Video



Add 3 Employees



Add 3 Milestones



Add a Logo



View More


View Less



SHARE THIS PAGE
















Add Page


Add Company
Add Person
Add Topic




Copy this code to embed a widget:



<div id="spoke-root"></div>
<script>(function(d, s, id) {
var js, sjs = d.getElementsByTagName(s)[0];
if (d.getElementById(id)) return;
js = d.createElement(s); js.id = id;
js.src = "//www.spoke.com/assets/widget.js";
sjs.parentNode.insertBefore(js, sjs);
}(document, 'script', 'spoke-widget-js'));</script>
    <div class="spoke-widget" data-host="//www.spoke.com" data-type="company" data-id="3e122f809e597c1000669dce" data-width="404" data-height="230" data-scroll="no" data-frame-border="none"></div>
    <div style="font-size: 9pt;"><a href="http://www.spoke.com/companies/nicholas-t-long-3e122f809e597c1000669dce">Nicholas T Long</a> widget provided by <a href="http://www.spoke.com">Spoke</a></div>











Some of Spoke's Content Providers








Become a Spoke Content Provider
Learn More











Nicholas T. Long - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















Nicholas T. Long
Board Member at Wolverine World Wide, Inc.


View Full Profile
Are you Nicholas T. Long? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Nicholas T. Long's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Nicholas T. Long's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Nicholas T. Long's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Nicholas T. Long through your network of contacts.
												








Nicholas T. Long's Executive Work History


Current


Board Member, 
Wolverine World Wide, Inc.


Past
To view Nicholas T. Long's complete executive work history, sign up now
Education


														 M.B.A., 
															Harvard University


Age
58

 
 


Nicholas T. Long's Biography



From 2011 until his retirement in 2015, Mr. Long served as Chief Executive Officer of MillerCoors LLC ("MillerCoors"), a joint venture between two publicly traded beverage companies. From 2008 to 2011, Mr. Long served as President and Chief Commercial Officer of MillerCoors. From 2007 to 2008, Mr. Long served as Chief Executive Officer of Miller Brewing Company, a beverage company, and he served as Chief Marketing Officer of Miller Brewing Company from 2005 to 2007. Prior to joining Miller Brewing Company, Mr. Long spent 17 years in various senior leadership positions at The Coca-Cola Company, a beverage company, including Vice President of S ...
(Read More)

			From 2011 until his retirement in 2015, Mr. Long served as Chief Executive Officer of MillerCoors LLC ("MillerCoors"), a joint venture between two publicly traded beverage companies. From 2008 to 2011, Mr. Long served as President and Chief Commercial Officer of MillerCoors. From 2007 to 2008, Mr. Long served as Chief Executive Officer of Miller Brewing Company, a beverage company, and he served as Chief Marketing Officer of Miller Brewing Company from 2005 to 2007. Prior to joining Miller Brewing Company, Mr. Long spent 17 years in various senior leadership positions at The Coca-Cola Company, a beverage company, including Vice President of Strategic Marketing, Global Brands, Vice President Strategic Marketing Research and Trends, President of Coca-Cola's Great Britain and Ireland Division and President of the Northwest Europe Division.

Experience and Skills:
Through his more than 20 years in senior positions at category-leading, branded companies, Mr. Long has developed significant marketing, international business and brand building expertise.
		
Source: Wolverine World Wide, Inc. on 03/28/2017
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Nicholas T. Long's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Nicholas T. Long. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Nicholas T. Long's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Nicholas T. Long's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Nicholas T. Long through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Nicholas T. Long


















Nicholas T. Long's Connections (30)





Sign up now to view Nicholas T. Long's 30 connections »









Brenda J. Lauderback
Board Member, Wolverine World Wide, Inc.









Timothy J. O'Donovan
Board Member, Wolverine World Wide, Inc.









James A. Gabel
Former President, Performance Group, Wolverine World Wide, Inc.









Andrew Simister
Former President, Lifestyle Group, Wolverine World Wide, Inc.









David T. Kollat
Lead Director of the Board, Wolverine World Wide, Inc.









William K. Gerber
Board Member, AK Steel Holding Corporation









Pamela L. Linton
Former Senior Vice President, Global Human Resources, Wolverine World Wide, Inc.









Gina R. Boswell
Board Member, ManpowerGroup Inc.









James D. Zwiers
President, Wolverine Outdoor and Lifestyle Group, Wolverine World Wide, Inc.









Blake W. Krueger
Chairman of the Board, Chief Executive Officer and President, Wolverine World Wide, Inc.








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









David J. O'Connor
President and CEO, The Madison Square Garden Company









Carl G. Annessa
EVP and COO, Hornbeck Offshore Services, Inc.












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993
















Nicholas T Long - Bella Vista, AR | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Nicholas T Long in Bella Vista, AR


Nicholas T Long

                                                                           Intelius found that Nicholas T Long  is  a male between 30 and 40 years old from Bella Vista, AR.  We have connected them to
                15 addresses,
                4 phones,
                and 4 relatives or associates.
         





Also Known As

Nick Todd Long


Get Report Now

Age

Nicholas T Long is in his 30s

Nicholas Has Lived In

Bella Vista, AR
Rockford, MI
Mena, AR

Nicholas's Relatives

Myranda Long
Elizabeth Brown
Benjamin Long
Patrick Brown







Nicholas T Long



Zodiac SignScorpio



GenderMale



Professional Status
Commercial Finance Manager at Elsevier B.V



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Nicholas? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Nicholas, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Nicholas T Long
Get a Criminal Check on Nicholas T Long
Get a Public Record Report on Nicholas T Long
Get a People Search Report on Nicholas T Long


Nicholas T Long's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Nicholas T Long has lived as well as Nicholas T Long's phone numbers and email addresses.




Nicholas T Long Has Lived in 6 States
Arkansas Address for Nicholas T Long


1 C***** L* 

Bella Vista, AR


Has Lived In

Bella Vista, AR
Rockford, MI


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Nicholas T Long

(479) ***-**** - Mena, AR 
(501) ***-**** - Mena, AR 
(920) ***-**** - Bella Vista, AR 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Nicholas T Long

l**********9@***.com


Get Email Report




Nicholas T Long's Education Information
Known Schools Attended
Learn about Nicholas T Long's academic history.  Find out which schools Nicholas T Long attended, the dates attended as well as the degrees Nicholas T Long received.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Nicholas T Long Has Attended 3 Schools
University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill 
Harvard Graduate School                                             
Harvard Graduate School of Business Administration                                             


Nicholas T Long's Professional Information
Information regarding Nicholas T Long's professional history.  Find out previous places Nicholas T Long has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Nicholas T Long Has Worked at 6 Places
Company: Elsevier B.V
               Title: Commercial Finance Manager
Company: Elsevier B.V
               Title: Business Controller
Nicholas T Long's Experience
Title: Commercial Finance Manager
               Company: Elsevier B.V
Job Details
               RELX Group is a world?leading provider of information and analytics for professional and business customers across industries. The group serves customers in more than 180 countries and has offices in about 40 countries. It employs approximately 30,000 people of whom half are in North America. RELX PLC is a London listed holding company which owns 52.9% of RELX Group. RELX NV is an Amsterdam listed holding company which owns 47.1% of RELX Group. The shares are traded on the London, Amsterdam and New York Stock Exchanges using the following ticker symbols: London: REL; Amsterdam: REN; New York: RELX and RENX. The total market capitalisation is approximately 27.8bn/31.2bn/$34.5bn*.
Title: Business Controller
               Company: Elsevier B.V
Job Details
               RELX Group is a world?leading provider of information and analytics for professional and business customers across industries. The group serves customers in more than 180 countries and has offices in about 40 countries. It employs approximately 30,000 people of whom half are in North America. RELX PLC is a London listed holding company which owns 52.9% of RELX Group. RELX NV is an Amsterdam listed holding company which owns 47.1% of RELX Group. The shares are traded on the London, Amsterdam and New York Stock Exchanges using the following ticker symbols: London: REL; Amsterdam: REN; New York: RELX and RENX. The total market capitalisation is approximately 27.8bn/31.2bn/$34.5bn*. 
Additional Professional Information on Nicholas T Long

 See Nicholas T Long's LinkedIn Profile



Nicholas T Long's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Nicholas T Long


Nicholas T Long's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Nicholas T Long's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Nicholas Long
Username Matches

                  NicholasLong
                  LongNicholas
                  Nicholas.Long
                  Long.Nicholas
                  Nicholas_Long
                  Long_Nicholas
                  Nicholas-Long
                  Long-Nicholas
                  NLong
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
N Long







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.











 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.







Nicholas Long, Beer Institute: Profile & Biography - Bloomberg


































































  

























Feedback





Nicholas "Tom" Long

Chairman,
Beer Institute






Career History




Chairman
Beer Institute, PRESENT


Chief Executive Officer
Millercoors LLC, 6/2011-6/2015


Pres/Chief Commercial Ofcr
Millercoors LLC, 7/2008-6/2011


Chief Marketing Officer
Miller Brewing Co, 7/2005-7/2006


President/CEO
Miller Brewing Co, 8/2006-UNKNOWN


Pres:NW Europe/VP:Natl Sales US
Coca-Cola Co, FORMER


Vice Chairman
Beer Institute, FORMER


Show More







Corporate Information
Address:



Phone:
-


Fax:
-











From The Web












Personal Information



Education



Harvard Business School
MBA


University of North Carolina System
Bachelor's Degree








Memberships



Board Memberships




Beer Institute


Chairman, PRESENT




Amcor Ltd


Board Member, 6/2017-PRESENT




Wolverine World Wide Inc


Board Member, 7/2011-PRESENT




Beer Institute


Vice Chairman, FORMER



Show More





Other Memberships




Boys And Girls Club of Milwaukee


Member









Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data


































NICHOLAS T LONG - ANDERSON, SC - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



SC



ANDERSON



Nonclassifiable Establishments



Nonclassifiable Establishments



                            NICHOLAS T LONG
                                    



 





















N 


NICHOLAS T LONG
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



2440 WHITEHALL RD ANDERSON, SC 29625
Get Directions








Business Info



 Founded 2010
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue --
 Employee Count --
 Industries Nonclassifiable Establishments
 Contacts --







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Nicholas T Long was founded in 2010, and is located at 2440 Whitehall Rd in Anderson. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







N

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.




















Nicholas T-Shirts | TeePublic

































search








shopping_cart
View My Cart







collections
All Designs




star_rate
Featured Designers




fiber_new
Newest Designers







account_circle
Log In




add_circle
Create Account









You have Javascript disabled. Javascript is required for this site to function properly.
Please enable Javascript and return here.









menu






Oh no, your cart is empty. Add something awesome to it!
Shop Now






Create Account


Log In

About TeePublic
















Browse

All Designs
New $14 Tees
Featured Designers
Newest Designers



Adult Apparel

T-Shirts
Tank Tops
Hoodies
Crewneck Sweatshirts
Long Sleeve T-Shirts
Baseball T-Shirts



Kids

Kids T-Shirts
Kids Hoodie
Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt
Onesie



Home Goods

Wall Art
Notebooks
Mugs



Cases & Stickers

Phone Cases
Laptop Cases
Stickers























Sort By:

Popular
Newest






Nicholas T-Shirts


Browse › Nicholas











Filter by Product




Adult Apparel


T-Shirts


Tank Tops


Hoodies


Crewneck Sweatshirts


Long Sleeve T-Shirts


Baseball T-Shirts


Kids Apparel


Kids T-Shirts


Kids Hoodie


Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt


Onesie


Home Goods


Wall Art


Notebooks


Mugs


Cases


Phone Cases


Laptop Cases


Stickers












FILTER BY PRODUCT:


Adult Apparel

T-Shirts


Tank Tops


Hoodies


Crewneck Sweatshirts


Long Sleeve T-Shirts


Baseball T-Shirts

Kids Apparel

Kids T-Shirts


Kids Hoodie


Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt


Onesie

Home Goods

Wall Art


Notebooks


Mugs

Cases & Stickers

Phone Cases


Laptop Cases


Stickers


Gifts and Merchandise




FILTER BY COLOR:


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp


&nbsp






RELATED TAGS:



nicholas


christmas


saint


grimms fairy tales


grimm fairy tales


adalind shade


juliette silverton


grimm


wesen


grimm tv show


blutbad












Main Tag:
Atheist Christmas T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Baseball Tee, Kids, Crewneck, Hoodie, Print, Case, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Hoodie, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Onesie


Tags:
green, red, mint, rainbow, color













Dancing Shiva Claus T-Shirt

by XOOXOO


$20









Main Tag:
Cosplay T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Baseball Tee, Kids, Crewneck, Hoodie, Print, Case, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Hoodie, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Onesie


Tags:
art, fanart, disney-animated, nicholas, wilde













Nick Wilde Tooniefied T-Shirt

by Tooniefied


$20









Main Tag:
Santa Claus T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Baseball Tee, Kids, Crewneck, Hoodie, Print, Case, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Hoodie, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Onesie


Tags:
designer, cartoon, joke, giving, many













Dancing Pastel Shiva Claus T-Shirt

by XOOXOO


$20









Main Tag:
Kawaii T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Baseball Tee, Kids, Crewneck, Hoodie, Print, Case, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Hoodie, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Onesie


Tags:
cute-santa-claus, green, red, contemporary, trendy













Santa Claus with Gifts T-Shirt

by XOOXOO


$20









Main Tag:
Zootopia T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Baseball Tee, Kids, Crewneck, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Hoodie, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Onesie


Tags:
methylamine, crystal-meth, meth, blue-meth, wool













Heisenbuck T-Shirt

by wloem


$20









Main Tag:
Trigun T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Baseball Tee, Kids, Crewneck, Hoodie, Print, Case, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Hoodie, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Onesie


Tags:
manga, anime, see-you-cow, rem, cowboy-bebop













Trigun Anime T-Shirt

by Daltoon


$20









Main Tag:
Zootopia T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Kids, Crewneck, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Hoodie, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Onesie


Tags:
methylamine, crystal-meth, meth, blue-meth, wool













Heisenbuck T-Shirt

by wloem


$20









Main Tag:
Trigun T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Baseball Tee, Kids, Crewneck, Hoodie, Print, Case, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Hoodie, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Onesie


Tags:
maximum, trigun-to-the-maximum-trigun, anime, knives, ladies













Trigun to the maximum T-Shirt

by KewlZidane


$20









Main Tag:
Zootropolis T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Baseball Tee, Kids, Crewneck, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Hoodie, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Onesie


Tags:
methylamine, crystal-meth, meth, blue-meth, wooly













Heisenbuck T-Shirt

by wloem


$20









Main Tag:
Mad Max T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Baseball Tee, Kids, Crewneck, Hoodie, Print, Case, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Hoodie, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Onesie


Tags:
joe, mad, max, fury, road













Mediocre. T-Shirt

by SomniumCorp


$20









Main Tag:
Bunny T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Baseball Tee, Kids, Crewneck, Hoodie, Print, Case, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Hoodie, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Onesie


Tags:
movie, zootopia, judy-hopps, nick-wilde, judy













Hustle, Sweetheart T-Shirt

by beepboopbeepclothing


$20









Main Tag:
Christmas T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Baseball Tee, Kids, Crewneck, Hoodie, Print, Case, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Hoodie, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Onesie


Tags:
chrsitmas-day, funny-christmas, ugly-christmas-sweater, merry-christmas, christmas-trees













Green Christmas Trees Pattern T-Shirt

by XOOXOO


$20









Main Tag:
Creepy Christmas T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Baseball Tee, Kids, Crewneck, Hoodie, Print, Case, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Hoodie, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Onesie


Tags:
nightmare-before-christmas, ugly-christmas-sweater, evil-christmas, creepy-christmas-tree, family













Addams Christmas Trees T-Shirt

by XOOXOO


$20









Main Tag:
Nicholas Cage T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker


Tags:
nicholas, cage, zoomania, bonaparte, national treasure













Nicholeon Bonappola T-Shirt

by tyler6897


$20









Main Tag:
Zootopia T-Shirt


Available on:
T-Shirt, Tank, Long Sleeve T-Shirt, Baseball Tee, Kids, Crewneck, Hoodie, Case, Laptop Case, Notebook, Mug, Sticker, Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt


Tags:
art, ginnifer-goodwin, methylamine, wooly, stuffed-toy













Zootopia T-Shirt

by OrdinaryMakka


$20


















close






Create an Account


or




Email Address



Username



Password



Confirm Password








Already have an account?

Log in.






TeePublic Login


or




Email Address



Password





Remember Me























Forgot your password?


New here?

Create an account.























Subscribe to our newsletter

For sales, exclusive content, and more!







Follow Us!






























Explore


All Designs


New $14 Tees


Featured Designers


Newest Designers


Trending Tags




Products


T-Shirts


Tank Tops


Long Sleeve T-Shirts


Baseball T-Shirts


Kids T-Shirts


Crewneck Sweatshirts


Hoodies


Wall Art


Phone Cases


Laptop Cases


Notebooks


Mugs


Stickers


Kids Hoodie


Kids Long Sleeve T-Shirt


Onesie




Designers


TeePublic Blog


Create






Design Guide






Info


Contact


Find My Order


Change My Order


Size Chart


FAQ


Affiliate Signup


Careers


Terms


Privacy Policy


Copyright Policy







© Brain Buster Enterprises 2012 -
2017
|
Privacy Policy
 | 
Terms

























Nicholas T. Clerk - Wikipedia





















 






Nicholas T. Clerk

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Nicholas Timothy Clerk


Born
(1930-03-03)3 March 1930
Adawso, Gold Coast


Died
22 September 2012(2012-09-22) (aged 82)
Accra, Ghana


Nationality



British subject (1930 - 1957)
Ghanaian (1957 - 2012)





Fields



Public administration
Public policy





Institutions
GIMPA


Education



Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School
Presbyterian Training College, Akropong
University of Leicester / University of London (BA, PGCE)
University of Southern California (MPA, DPA)
Trinity Theological Seminary (Dipl.-Theol.)





Known for
Contributions to public administration and public policy


Nicholas Timothy Clerk (3 March 1930 - † 22 September 2012) was a Ghanaian academic, public administrator and Presbyterian minister who served as the Rector of the Ghana Institute of Management and Public Administration (GIMPA), the country’s premier graduate school of public policy, public administration and governance.[1][2] He was also the Vice-Chairman of the Public Services Commission of Ghana.[1][2] Clerk chaired the Public Services Commission of Uganda from 1989 to 1990.[1][3][4]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career
3 Family
4 Personal life
5 Death
6 Selected works
7 References



Early life and education[edit]
He was born on 3 March 1930 in Adawso in the Eastern Region of Ghana.[1] His father, Carl Henry Clerk (1895 - 1982) was an agricultural educator, journalist, editor and Presbyterian minister who was elected the Fourth Synod Clerk of the Presbyterian Church of the Gold Coast from 1950 to 1954.[5][6] Clerk was also the Editor of the Christian Messenger, the news magazine of the Presbyterian Church of Ghana from 1960 to 1963.[6] Clerk's mother, Martha Ayorkor Quao (1912-1989) hailed from La and Ga Mashie.[7] He had his primary education at Presbyterian schools at Kpong, Odumase Krobo, Somanya and Osu according to teaching positngs of his father.[1][4] He attended the middle boarding school, The Salem School at Osu from 1942 to 1945. [1][8] He had his secondary education the Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School (Presec), Odumase-Krobo where he was the Senior Prefect in 1949. [1] He received theology and pedagogy training at the Presbyterian Training College, Akropong.[1] The college was founded by the Basel Mission in 1848 as the second oldest higher educational institution in West Africa after Fourah Bay College which was established in 1827.[9][10] He won a colonial scholarship to study English literature at the University of Leicester, then part of the University of London external system, receiving his honours bachelor's degree in 1955. [1][4] In order to qualify as an education officer, he obtained his professional certification, a Postgraduate Certificate in Education, from the Institute of Education at the University College of Ghana, also an affiliate of the University of London external system at the time. [1][4] He later attended the University of Southern California on a fellowship where he obtained a master’s degree and a doctorate in public administration.[1] He also earned a diploma in theology from the Trinity Theological Seminary and was ordained a Presbyterian minister.[1]
Career[edit]
In his early career, he was a teacher at this alma mater, Presbyterian Boys Secondary School (Presec), Odumase-Krobo, the Government Training College at Peki and Tamale and at the Department of Liberal Arts at the Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology.[1] He was later recruited as a lecturer at the then newly established Ghana Institute of Management and Public Administration (GIMPA) in 1962 and rose through the ranks to become the Rector of the Institute. [1][4] He was re-assigned by the PNDC government to the Public Services Commission of Ghana and later became the Vice-Chairman.[1] Between 1989 and 1990, he was appointed by the United Nations Development Programme to be the Chairman of the Public Services Commission of Uganda, a role in which he reviewed, reorganized and reformed the Ugandan public service. [1][3] He performed similar roles in his capacity as a public services, management and health administration consultant in other African countries including Botswana, Kenya, Liberia, Morocco, Nigeria, Sierra Leone, Tanzania and The Gambia. [1][4] He worked with the Presbyterian Church of Ghana in a senior administrative capacity at its headquarters and was also a lecturer at the Trinity Theological Seminary, Legon where he taught church management and administration courses. [1][4] For a long time, he was also the minister in charge of the Presbyterian church in Nungua. [1][4]
Family[edit]
Nicholas Timothy Clerk was a fourth generation member of the historically important Clerk family of Accra, Ghana.[2][11] His paternal great-grandfather, Alexander Worthy Clerk (1820 - 1906), a Jamaican Moravian missionary who arrived in the Danish Protectorate of Christiansborg (now the suburb of Osu) in Accra in the Gold Coast in 1843, as part of the original group of 24 West Indian missionaries who worked under the auspices of the Basel Evangelical Missionary Society of Basel, Switzerland.[12][13][14][11] A.W. Clerk was a pioneer of the Presbyterian Church of Ghana and a leader in education in colonial Ghana, establishing a boarding middle school, The Salem School in 1843. His paternal great-grandmother, Pauline Hesse was from the Gold Coast, and was of German and Ga-Dangme heritage.[15] His grandfather was Nicholas Timothy Clerk (1862 -1961), a Basel-trained theologian and missionary who was the First Synod Clerk of the Presbyterian Church of the Gold Coast from 1918 to 1932.[16][12] N. T. Clerk was a founding father of the all boys’ boarding high school, Presbyterian Boys’ Secondary School established in 1938.[1][2] His grandmother, Anna Alice Meyer (1873 -1934) was of Ga-Dangme and Danish descent.[16][16]
His uncle, Theodore S. Clerk (1909 -1965) was the first African architect of the Gold Coast who planned and developed the port city of Tema.[17][18][19] His aunt, Matilda J. Clerk (1916 -1984) was the second Ghanaian woman to become a physician.[20] His granduncle, Emmanuel Charles Quist (1880 -1959), a barrister and judge became the first African President of the Legislative Council from 1949 to 1951, Speaker of the National Assembly of the Gold Coast from 1951 to 1957, and Speaker of the National Assembly of Ghana from 1957 to 1959.[21]
Maternally, Clerk’s uncle was the Ghanaian barrister and judge, Nii Amaa Ollennu (1906 - 1986) who was elected the Speaker of the Parliament of Ghana during the Second Republic as well as serving as the Chairman of the Presidential Commission and acting President of Ghana from 7 August 1970 to 31 August 1970.[22][23] His other maternal uncle was Nathan Quao (1915 - 2005), a diplomat, educationist and public servant who rose to become a presidential advisor on governance to the governments of several Heads of State of Ghana.[24][25] In addition, his first cousin was also the Ghanaian economist and diplomat, Amon Nikoi (1930 - 2002) who was the Governor of the Bank of Ghana from 1973 to 1977 and Finance minister from 1979 to 1981.[26][27] He was also the cousin of Alexander Adu Clerk (born 1947), the sleep medicine specialist and psychiatrist. [28][29][30][31][32][33][34][35][36]
Personal life[edit]
Clerk had six children including Nicholas T. Clerk, Jr. (born 1963), a consultant obstetrician-gynaecologist, with a specialty in ambulatory gynaecology [37][38] and Christine A. Clerk (born 1967), an epidemiologist and a malaria specialist. [39][40][41] His younger brother is the Ghanaian botanist, George C. Clerk (born 1931). [42][43][44] N. T. Clerk was also a trained pianist and a flautist. [4]
Death[edit]
He died on 22 September 2012 of natural causes.[1] He was buried at the Basel Mission Cemetery at Osu, Accra.[1]
Selected works[edit]

Clerk, N. T. (1972) Bureaucracy and the One-party State: Politics and Administrative Transformation in Ghana [45]
Clerk, N. T. & Dabi-Dankwa, S.N.O. (1988) Half a century of secondary school education by the Presbyterian Church : the story of Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School, Odumase Krobo / Legon golden jubilee, 1938-1988 [46]
Clerk, N. T. (1990) Report of the Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission, 1989-1990 / Vol. 1, Main report. Entebbe: Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs [3]

References[edit]


^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v "PRESEC | ALUMINI PORTAL". 2016-11-11. Archived from the original on 11 November 2016. Retrieved 2017-06-11. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ a b c d "70 years of excellent secondary education" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 22 July 2011. 
^ a b c Uganda; Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission; Clerk, Nicholas T; Uganda; Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs (1990). Report of the Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission, 1989-1990 Vol. 1, Vol. 1,. Entebbe: Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Obituary: The Rev. Dr. Nicholas Timothy Clerk. Accra: Christian Messenger: Presbyterian Church of Ghana Funeral Bulletin. 27 October 2012. 
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (1954-08-26). Jet. Johnson Publishing Company. 
^ a b Clerk, Nicholas, T. (5 June 1982). Obituary: The Reverend Carl Henry Clerk. Accra: Presbyterian Church of Ghana, Funeral Bulletin. 
^ "FamilySearch.org". familysearch.org. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Presbyterian Boys Boarding School, Osu Salem". www.osusalem.org. Retrieved 2017-07-06. 
^ "PRESEC | ALUMINI PORTAL". www.odadee.net (in Russian). Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-05-04. 
^ "Presbyterian College of Education (Akropong Akuapem) - T-TEL". www.t-tel.org. Archived from the original on 25 December 2015. Retrieved 2017-06-12. 
^ a b Anquandah, James (November 2006). Ghana-Caribbean Relations - From Slavery Times to Present: Lecture to the Ghana-Caribbean Association (PDF). Accra: National Commission. Archived (PDF) from the original on 30 July 2016. 
^ a b Debrunner, Hans W. (1965). Owura Nico, the Rev. Nicholas Timothy Clerk, 1862-1961: pioneer and church leader. Watervile Publishing House. 
^ Debrunner, Hans W. (1965). Owura Nico, the Rev. Nicholas Timothy Clerk, 1862-1961: pioneer and church leader. Watervile Publishing House. 
^ Debrunner, Hans W. (1967). A history of Christianity in Ghana,. Waterville Pub. House. Archived from the original on 3 July 2013. 
^ Sill, Ulrike (2010). Encounters in Quest of Christian Womanhood: The Basel Mission in Pre- and Early Colonial Ghana. BRILL. ISBN 9004188886. 
^ a b c "Clerk, Nicholas Timothy, Ghana, Basel Mission". www.dacb.org. Archived from the original on 28 March 2016. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Goold, David. "Dictionary of Scottish Architects - DSA Architect Biography Report (June 11, 2017, 7:51 pm)". www.scottisharchitects.org.uk. Archived from the original on 7 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Ofori-Mensah. "22 Successful Ghanaians Who Went To Achimota School". OMGVoice. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Profile of THEODORE SHEALTIEL CLERK". MyHeritage.com. Archived from the original on 7 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Jr, Adell Patton (1996-04-13). Physicians, Colonial Racism, and Diaspora in West Africa (1st edition ed.). Gainesville: University Press of Florida. p. 29. ISBN 9780813014326. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. CS1 maint: Extra text (link)
^ "Janus: Progress in the Colonies, 1940s-1950s". janus.lib.cam.ac.uk. Retrieved 2017-06-06. 
^ "Official Web Site for the Judicial Service of the Republic of Ghana". 2005-04-14. Archived from the original on 14 April 2005. Retrieved 2017-06-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "Countries Ga-Gi". rulers.org. Archived from the original on 3 April 2007. Retrieved 2017-06-06. 
^ "Nathan Quao to be given state burial on April 8". ModernGhana.com. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Nathan Quao to be given state burial on April 8". www.ghanaweb.com. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Former Bank of Ghana Governor buried at La". www.ghanaweb.com. Archived from the original on 21 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-22. 
^ "Dr Amon Nikoi, Former Governor of the Bank of Ghana". www.ghanaweb.com. Archived from the original on 27 October 2016. Retrieved 2017-04-22. 
^ ":: Sleep Medicine Services ::". www.sleepmedicineservice.com. Archived from the original on 2016-01-25. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alexander Clerk, MD - San Jose, CA - Psychiatry & Sleep Medicine | Healthgrades.com". www.healthgrades.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-12. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Alexander A. Clerk, MD: Sleep Medicine, Psychiatry". doctor.webmd.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-12. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Alex A. Clerk, M.D. - Physicians Medical Group of San Jose". Physicians Medical Group of San Jose. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, Psychiatry - San Jose , CA |". Sharecare. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, MD – San Jose, CA | Psychiatry on Doximity". Doximity. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, MD | San Jose, CA | Psychiatrist". www.vitals.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk MD: Psychiatry, San Jose, CA". U.S. News. Archived from the original on 12 April 2017. Retrieved 12 April 2017. 
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (1992-07-01). Ebony. Johnson Publishing Company. [permanent dead link]
^ "Mr Nicholas Clerk: Obstetrics and gynaecology". finder.bupa.co.uk. Archived from the original on 6 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ "Mr Nick Clerk | Consultant Gynaecologist | Spire Healthcare". www.spirehealthcare.com. Retrieved 2017-04-22. [permanent dead link]
^ "Announcement: Join PATH at the American Society of Tropical Medicine and Hygiene conference - PATH". www.path.org. Archived from the original on 26 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-26. 
^ PATH (November 2012). "Guiding product development of malaria diagnostics to support elimination programs: The Target Product Profile" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 27 April 2017. 
^ PATH (November 2012). "Zambia Trip Report: Project DIAMETER (Diagnostics for Malaria Elimination Toward Eradication)" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 26 April 2017. 
^ "Contact Us | Department of Botany". webcache.googleusercontent.com. Archived from the original on 29 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "Membership". gaas-gh.org. Archived from the original on 29 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ "Fellowship". gaas-gh.org. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ Clerk, Nicholas Timothy (1972). Bureaucracy and the One-party State: Politics and Administrative Transformation in Ghana. University of Southern California. 
^ Clerk, Nicholas T; Dabi-Dankwa, Seth N. O (1988). Half a century of secondary school education by the Presbyterian Church: the story of Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School, Odumase Krobo/Legon golden jubilee, 1938-1988. Place of publication not identified: publisher not identified. 




Christianity portal












 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Nicholas_T._Clerk&oldid=792098212"					
Categories: 1930 births2012 deathsDeaths from prostate cancerAfro-JamaicanClerk (surname)Ga-Adangbe peopleGhanaian educatorsGhanaian academicsGhanaian people of Danish descentGhanaian people of German descent20th-century Presbyterian ministersPresbyterian ministersGhanaian PresbyteriansGhanaian ProtestantsAcademics of the Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and TechnologyAlumni of the University of LeicesterAlumni of the University of LondonPeople from AccraUniversity of Ghana alumniUniversity of Southern California alumniUSC Sol Price School of Public Policy alumniPresbyterian Boys' Senior High School alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 Russian-language sources (ru)CS1 maint: Extra textAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksEngvarB from June 2017Use dmy dates from June 2017 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 13:01.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Nicholas T. Clerk - Wikipedia





















 






Nicholas T. Clerk

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Nicholas Timothy Clerk


Born
(1930-03-03)3 March 1930
Adawso, Gold Coast


Died
22 September 2012(2012-09-22) (aged 82)
Accra, Ghana


Nationality



British subject (1930 - 1957)
Ghanaian (1957 - 2012)





Fields



Public administration
Public policy





Institutions
GIMPA


Education



Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School
Presbyterian Training College, Akropong
University of Leicester / University of London (BA, PGCE)
University of Southern California (MPA, DPA)
Trinity Theological Seminary (Dipl.-Theol.)





Known for
Contributions to public administration and public policy


Nicholas Timothy Clerk (3 March 1930 - † 22 September 2012) was a Ghanaian academic, public administrator and Presbyterian minister who served as the Rector of the Ghana Institute of Management and Public Administration (GIMPA), the country’s premier graduate school of public policy, public administration and governance.[1][2] He was also the Vice-Chairman of the Public Services Commission of Ghana.[1][2] Clerk chaired the Public Services Commission of Uganda from 1989 to 1990.[1][3][4]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career
3 Family
4 Personal life
5 Death
6 Selected works
7 References



Early life and education[edit]
He was born on 3 March 1930 in Adawso in the Eastern Region of Ghana.[1] His father, Carl Henry Clerk (1895 - 1982) was an agricultural educator, journalist, editor and Presbyterian minister who was elected the Fourth Synod Clerk of the Presbyterian Church of the Gold Coast from 1950 to 1954.[5][6] Clerk was also the Editor of the Christian Messenger, the news magazine of the Presbyterian Church of Ghana from 1960 to 1963.[6] Clerk's mother, Martha Ayorkor Quao (1912-1989) hailed from La and Ga Mashie.[7] He had his primary education at Presbyterian schools at Kpong, Odumase Krobo, Somanya and Osu according to teaching positngs of his father.[1][4] He attended the middle boarding school, The Salem School at Osu from 1942 to 1945. [1][8] He had his secondary education the Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School (Presec), Odumase-Krobo where he was the Senior Prefect in 1949. [1] He received theology and pedagogy training at the Presbyterian Training College, Akropong.[1] The college was founded by the Basel Mission in 1848 as the second oldest higher educational institution in West Africa after Fourah Bay College which was established in 1827.[9][10] He won a colonial scholarship to study English literature at the University of Leicester, then part of the University of London external system, receiving his honours bachelor's degree in 1955. [1][4] In order to qualify as an education officer, he obtained his professional certification, a Postgraduate Certificate in Education, from the Institute of Education at the University College of Ghana, also an affiliate of the University of London external system at the time. [1][4] He later attended the University of Southern California on a fellowship where he obtained a master’s degree and a doctorate in public administration.[1] He also earned a diploma in theology from the Trinity Theological Seminary and was ordained a Presbyterian minister.[1]
Career[edit]
In his early career, he was a teacher at this alma mater, Presbyterian Boys Secondary School (Presec), Odumase-Krobo, the Government Training College at Peki and Tamale and at the Department of Liberal Arts at the Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology.[1] He was later recruited as a lecturer at the then newly established Ghana Institute of Management and Public Administration (GIMPA) in 1962 and rose through the ranks to become the Rector of the Institute. [1][4] He was re-assigned by the PNDC government to the Public Services Commission of Ghana and later became the Vice-Chairman.[1] Between 1989 and 1990, he was appointed by the United Nations Development Programme to be the Chairman of the Public Services Commission of Uganda, a role in which he reviewed, reorganized and reformed the Ugandan public service. [1][3] He performed similar roles in his capacity as a public services, management and health administration consultant in other African countries including Botswana, Kenya, Liberia, Morocco, Nigeria, Sierra Leone, Tanzania and The Gambia. [1][4] He worked with the Presbyterian Church of Ghana in a senior administrative capacity at its headquarters and was also a lecturer at the Trinity Theological Seminary, Legon where he taught church management and administration courses. [1][4] For a long time, he was also the minister in charge of the Presbyterian church in Nungua. [1][4]
Family[edit]
Nicholas Timothy Clerk was a fourth generation member of the historically important Clerk family of Accra, Ghana.[2][11] His paternal great-grandfather, Alexander Worthy Clerk (1820 - 1906), a Jamaican Moravian missionary who arrived in the Danish Protectorate of Christiansborg (now the suburb of Osu) in Accra in the Gold Coast in 1843, as part of the original group of 24 West Indian missionaries who worked under the auspices of the Basel Evangelical Missionary Society of Basel, Switzerland.[12][13][14][11] A.W. Clerk was a pioneer of the Presbyterian Church of Ghana and a leader in education in colonial Ghana, establishing a boarding middle school, The Salem School in 1843. His paternal great-grandmother, Pauline Hesse was from the Gold Coast, and was of German and Ga-Dangme heritage.[15] His grandfather was Nicholas Timothy Clerk (1862 -1961), a Basel-trained theologian and missionary who was the First Synod Clerk of the Presbyterian Church of the Gold Coast from 1918 to 1932.[16][12] N. T. Clerk was a founding father of the all boys’ boarding high school, Presbyterian Boys’ Secondary School established in 1938.[1][2] His grandmother, Anna Alice Meyer (1873 -1934) was of Ga-Dangme and Danish descent.[16][16]
His uncle, Theodore S. Clerk (1909 -1965) was the first African architect of the Gold Coast who planned and developed the port city of Tema.[17][18][19] His aunt, Matilda J. Clerk (1916 -1984) was the second Ghanaian woman to become a physician.[20] His granduncle, Emmanuel Charles Quist (1880 -1959), a barrister and judge became the first African President of the Legislative Council from 1949 to 1951, Speaker of the National Assembly of the Gold Coast from 1951 to 1957, and Speaker of the National Assembly of Ghana from 1957 to 1959.[21]
Maternally, Clerk’s uncle was the Ghanaian barrister and judge, Nii Amaa Ollennu (1906 - 1986) who was elected the Speaker of the Parliament of Ghana during the Second Republic as well as serving as the Chairman of the Presidential Commission and acting President of Ghana from 7 August 1970 to 31 August 1970.[22][23] His other maternal uncle was Nathan Quao (1915 - 2005), a diplomat, educationist and public servant who rose to become a presidential advisor on governance to the governments of several Heads of State of Ghana.[24][25] In addition, his first cousin was also the Ghanaian economist and diplomat, Amon Nikoi (1930 - 2002) who was the Governor of the Bank of Ghana from 1973 to 1977 and Finance minister from 1979 to 1981.[26][27] He was also the cousin of Alexander Adu Clerk (born 1947), the sleep medicine specialist and psychiatrist. [28][29][30][31][32][33][34][35][36]
Personal life[edit]
Clerk had six children including Nicholas T. Clerk, Jr. (born 1963), a consultant obstetrician-gynaecologist, with a specialty in ambulatory gynaecology [37][38] and Christine A. Clerk (born 1967), an epidemiologist and a malaria specialist. [39][40][41] His younger brother is the Ghanaian botanist, George C. Clerk (born 1931). [42][43][44] N. T. Clerk was also a trained pianist and a flautist. [4]
Death[edit]
He died on 22 September 2012 of natural causes.[1] He was buried at the Basel Mission Cemetery at Osu, Accra.[1]
Selected works[edit]

Clerk, N. T. (1972) Bureaucracy and the One-party State: Politics and Administrative Transformation in Ghana [45]
Clerk, N. T. & Dabi-Dankwa, S.N.O. (1988) Half a century of secondary school education by the Presbyterian Church : the story of Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School, Odumase Krobo / Legon golden jubilee, 1938-1988 [46]
Clerk, N. T. (1990) Report of the Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission, 1989-1990 / Vol. 1, Main report. Entebbe: Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs [3]

References[edit]


^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v "PRESEC | ALUMINI PORTAL". 2016-11-11. Archived from the original on 11 November 2016. Retrieved 2017-06-11. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ a b c d "70 years of excellent secondary education" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 22 July 2011. 
^ a b c Uganda; Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission; Clerk, Nicholas T; Uganda; Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs (1990). Report of the Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission, 1989-1990 Vol. 1, Vol. 1,. Entebbe: Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Obituary: The Rev. Dr. Nicholas Timothy Clerk. Accra: Christian Messenger: Presbyterian Church of Ghana Funeral Bulletin. 27 October 2012. 
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (1954-08-26). Jet. Johnson Publishing Company. 
^ a b Clerk, Nicholas, T. (5 June 1982). Obituary: The Reverend Carl Henry Clerk. Accra: Presbyterian Church of Ghana, Funeral Bulletin. 
^ "FamilySearch.org". familysearch.org. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Presbyterian Boys Boarding School, Osu Salem". www.osusalem.org. Retrieved 2017-07-06. 
^ "PRESEC | ALUMINI PORTAL". www.odadee.net (in Russian). Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-05-04. 
^ "Presbyterian College of Education (Akropong Akuapem) - T-TEL". www.t-tel.org. Archived from the original on 25 December 2015. Retrieved 2017-06-12. 
^ a b Anquandah, James (November 2006). Ghana-Caribbean Relations - From Slavery Times to Present: Lecture to the Ghana-Caribbean Association (PDF). Accra: National Commission. Archived (PDF) from the original on 30 July 2016. 
^ a b Debrunner, Hans W. (1965). Owura Nico, the Rev. Nicholas Timothy Clerk, 1862-1961: pioneer and church leader. Watervile Publishing House. 
^ Debrunner, Hans W. (1965). Owura Nico, the Rev. Nicholas Timothy Clerk, 1862-1961: pioneer and church leader. Watervile Publishing House. 
^ Debrunner, Hans W. (1967). A history of Christianity in Ghana,. Waterville Pub. House. Archived from the original on 3 July 2013. 
^ Sill, Ulrike (2010). Encounters in Quest of Christian Womanhood: The Basel Mission in Pre- and Early Colonial Ghana. BRILL. ISBN 9004188886. 
^ a b c "Clerk, Nicholas Timothy, Ghana, Basel Mission". www.dacb.org. Archived from the original on 28 March 2016. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Goold, David. "Dictionary of Scottish Architects - DSA Architect Biography Report (June 11, 2017, 7:51 pm)". www.scottisharchitects.org.uk. Archived from the original on 7 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Ofori-Mensah. "22 Successful Ghanaians Who Went To Achimota School". OMGVoice. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Profile of THEODORE SHEALTIEL CLERK". MyHeritage.com. Archived from the original on 7 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Jr, Adell Patton (1996-04-13). Physicians, Colonial Racism, and Diaspora in West Africa (1st edition ed.). Gainesville: University Press of Florida. p. 29. ISBN 9780813014326. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. CS1 maint: Extra text (link)
^ "Janus: Progress in the Colonies, 1940s-1950s". janus.lib.cam.ac.uk. Retrieved 2017-06-06. 
^ "Official Web Site for the Judicial Service of the Republic of Ghana". 2005-04-14. Archived from the original on 14 April 2005. Retrieved 2017-06-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "Countries Ga-Gi". rulers.org. Archived from the original on 3 April 2007. Retrieved 2017-06-06. 
^ "Nathan Quao to be given state burial on April 8". ModernGhana.com. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Nathan Quao to be given state burial on April 8". www.ghanaweb.com. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Former Bank of Ghana Governor buried at La". www.ghanaweb.com. Archived from the original on 21 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-22. 
^ "Dr Amon Nikoi, Former Governor of the Bank of Ghana". www.ghanaweb.com. Archived from the original on 27 October 2016. Retrieved 2017-04-22. 
^ ":: Sleep Medicine Services ::". www.sleepmedicineservice.com. Archived from the original on 2016-01-25. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alexander Clerk, MD - San Jose, CA - Psychiatry & Sleep Medicine | Healthgrades.com". www.healthgrades.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-12. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Alexander A. Clerk, MD: Sleep Medicine, Psychiatry". doctor.webmd.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-12. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Alex A. Clerk, M.D. - Physicians Medical Group of San Jose". Physicians Medical Group of San Jose. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, Psychiatry - San Jose , CA |". Sharecare. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, MD – San Jose, CA | Psychiatry on Doximity". Doximity. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, MD | San Jose, CA | Psychiatrist". www.vitals.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk MD: Psychiatry, San Jose, CA". U.S. News. Archived from the original on 12 April 2017. Retrieved 12 April 2017. 
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (1992-07-01). Ebony. Johnson Publishing Company. [permanent dead link]
^ "Mr Nicholas Clerk: Obstetrics and gynaecology". finder.bupa.co.uk. Archived from the original on 6 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ "Mr Nick Clerk | Consultant Gynaecologist | Spire Healthcare". www.spirehealthcare.com. Retrieved 2017-04-22. [permanent dead link]
^ "Announcement: Join PATH at the American Society of Tropical Medicine and Hygiene conference - PATH". www.path.org. Archived from the original on 26 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-26. 
^ PATH (November 2012). "Guiding product development of malaria diagnostics to support elimination programs: The Target Product Profile" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 27 April 2017. 
^ PATH (November 2012). "Zambia Trip Report: Project DIAMETER (Diagnostics for Malaria Elimination Toward Eradication)" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 26 April 2017. 
^ "Contact Us | Department of Botany". webcache.googleusercontent.com. Archived from the original on 29 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "Membership". gaas-gh.org. Archived from the original on 29 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ "Fellowship". gaas-gh.org. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ Clerk, Nicholas Timothy (1972). Bureaucracy and the One-party State: Politics and Administrative Transformation in Ghana. University of Southern California. 
^ Clerk, Nicholas T; Dabi-Dankwa, Seth N. O (1988). Half a century of secondary school education by the Presbyterian Church: the story of Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School, Odumase Krobo/Legon golden jubilee, 1938-1988. Place of publication not identified: publisher not identified. 




Christianity portal












 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Nicholas_T._Clerk&oldid=792098212"					
Categories: 1930 births2012 deathsDeaths from prostate cancerAfro-JamaicanClerk (surname)Ga-Adangbe peopleGhanaian educatorsGhanaian academicsGhanaian people of Danish descentGhanaian people of German descent20th-century Presbyterian ministersPresbyterian ministersGhanaian PresbyteriansGhanaian ProtestantsAcademics of the Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and TechnologyAlumni of the University of LeicesterAlumni of the University of LondonPeople from AccraUniversity of Ghana alumniUniversity of Southern California alumniUSC Sol Price School of Public Policy alumniPresbyterian Boys' Senior High School alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 Russian-language sources (ru)CS1 maint: Extra textAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksEngvarB from June 2017Use dmy dates from June 2017 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 13:01.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Nicholas T. Clerk - Wikipedia





















 






Nicholas T. Clerk

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Nicholas Timothy Clerk


Born
(1930-03-03)3 March 1930
Adawso, Gold Coast


Died
22 September 2012(2012-09-22) (aged 82)
Accra, Ghana


Nationality



British subject (1930 - 1957)
Ghanaian (1957 - 2012)





Fields



Public administration
Public policy





Institutions
GIMPA


Education



Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School
Presbyterian Training College, Akropong
University of Leicester / University of London (BA, PGCE)
University of Southern California (MPA, DPA)
Trinity Theological Seminary (Dipl.-Theol.)





Known for
Contributions to public administration and public policy


Nicholas Timothy Clerk (3 March 1930 - † 22 September 2012) was a Ghanaian academic, public administrator and Presbyterian minister who served as the Rector of the Ghana Institute of Management and Public Administration (GIMPA), the country’s premier graduate school of public policy, public administration and governance.[1][2] He was also the Vice-Chairman of the Public Services Commission of Ghana.[1][2] Clerk chaired the Public Services Commission of Uganda from 1989 to 1990.[1][3][4]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career
3 Family
4 Personal life
5 Death
6 Selected works
7 References



Early life and education[edit]
He was born on 3 March 1930 in Adawso in the Eastern Region of Ghana.[1] His father, Carl Henry Clerk (1895 - 1982) was an agricultural educator, journalist, editor and Presbyterian minister who was elected the Fourth Synod Clerk of the Presbyterian Church of the Gold Coast from 1950 to 1954.[5][6] Clerk was also the Editor of the Christian Messenger, the news magazine of the Presbyterian Church of Ghana from 1960 to 1963.[6] Clerk's mother, Martha Ayorkor Quao (1912-1989) hailed from La and Ga Mashie.[7] He had his primary education at Presbyterian schools at Kpong, Odumase Krobo, Somanya and Osu according to teaching positngs of his father.[1][4] He attended the middle boarding school, The Salem School at Osu from 1942 to 1945. [1][8] He had his secondary education the Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School (Presec), Odumase-Krobo where he was the Senior Prefect in 1949. [1] He received theology and pedagogy training at the Presbyterian Training College, Akropong.[1] The college was founded by the Basel Mission in 1848 as the second oldest higher educational institution in West Africa after Fourah Bay College which was established in 1827.[9][10] He won a colonial scholarship to study English literature at the University of Leicester, then part of the University of London external system, receiving his honours bachelor's degree in 1955. [1][4] In order to qualify as an education officer, he obtained his professional certification, a Postgraduate Certificate in Education, from the Institute of Education at the University College of Ghana, also an affiliate of the University of London external system at the time. [1][4] He later attended the University of Southern California on a fellowship where he obtained a master’s degree and a doctorate in public administration.[1] He also earned a diploma in theology from the Trinity Theological Seminary and was ordained a Presbyterian minister.[1]
Career[edit]
In his early career, he was a teacher at this alma mater, Presbyterian Boys Secondary School (Presec), Odumase-Krobo, the Government Training College at Peki and Tamale and at the Department of Liberal Arts at the Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology.[1] He was later recruited as a lecturer at the then newly established Ghana Institute of Management and Public Administration (GIMPA) in 1962 and rose through the ranks to become the Rector of the Institute. [1][4] He was re-assigned by the PNDC government to the Public Services Commission of Ghana and later became the Vice-Chairman.[1] Between 1989 and 1990, he was appointed by the United Nations Development Programme to be the Chairman of the Public Services Commission of Uganda, a role in which he reviewed, reorganized and reformed the Ugandan public service. [1][3] He performed similar roles in his capacity as a public services, management and health administration consultant in other African countries including Botswana, Kenya, Liberia, Morocco, Nigeria, Sierra Leone, Tanzania and The Gambia. [1][4] He worked with the Presbyterian Church of Ghana in a senior administrative capacity at its headquarters and was also a lecturer at the Trinity Theological Seminary, Legon where he taught church management and administration courses. [1][4] For a long time, he was also the minister in charge of the Presbyterian church in Nungua. [1][4]
Family[edit]
Nicholas Timothy Clerk was a fourth generation member of the historically important Clerk family of Accra, Ghana.[2][11] His paternal great-grandfather, Alexander Worthy Clerk (1820 - 1906), a Jamaican Moravian missionary who arrived in the Danish Protectorate of Christiansborg (now the suburb of Osu) in Accra in the Gold Coast in 1843, as part of the original group of 24 West Indian missionaries who worked under the auspices of the Basel Evangelical Missionary Society of Basel, Switzerland.[12][13][14][11] A.W. Clerk was a pioneer of the Presbyterian Church of Ghana and a leader in education in colonial Ghana, establishing a boarding middle school, The Salem School in 1843. His paternal great-grandmother, Pauline Hesse was from the Gold Coast, and was of German and Ga-Dangme heritage.[15] His grandfather was Nicholas Timothy Clerk (1862 -1961), a Basel-trained theologian and missionary who was the First Synod Clerk of the Presbyterian Church of the Gold Coast from 1918 to 1932.[16][12] N. T. Clerk was a founding father of the all boys’ boarding high school, Presbyterian Boys’ Secondary School established in 1938.[1][2] His grandmother, Anna Alice Meyer (1873 -1934) was of Ga-Dangme and Danish descent.[16][16]
His uncle, Theodore S. Clerk (1909 -1965) was the first African architect of the Gold Coast who planned and developed the port city of Tema.[17][18][19] His aunt, Matilda J. Clerk (1916 -1984) was the second Ghanaian woman to become a physician.[20] His granduncle, Emmanuel Charles Quist (1880 -1959), a barrister and judge became the first African President of the Legislative Council from 1949 to 1951, Speaker of the National Assembly of the Gold Coast from 1951 to 1957, and Speaker of the National Assembly of Ghana from 1957 to 1959.[21]
Maternally, Clerk’s uncle was the Ghanaian barrister and judge, Nii Amaa Ollennu (1906 - 1986) who was elected the Speaker of the Parliament of Ghana during the Second Republic as well as serving as the Chairman of the Presidential Commission and acting President of Ghana from 7 August 1970 to 31 August 1970.[22][23] His other maternal uncle was Nathan Quao (1915 - 2005), a diplomat, educationist and public servant who rose to become a presidential advisor on governance to the governments of several Heads of State of Ghana.[24][25] In addition, his first cousin was also the Ghanaian economist and diplomat, Amon Nikoi (1930 - 2002) who was the Governor of the Bank of Ghana from 1973 to 1977 and Finance minister from 1979 to 1981.[26][27] He was also the cousin of Alexander Adu Clerk (born 1947), the sleep medicine specialist and psychiatrist. [28][29][30][31][32][33][34][35][36]
Personal life[edit]
Clerk had six children including Nicholas T. Clerk, Jr. (born 1963), a consultant obstetrician-gynaecologist, with a specialty in ambulatory gynaecology [37][38] and Christine A. Clerk (born 1967), an epidemiologist and a malaria specialist. [39][40][41] His younger brother is the Ghanaian botanist, George C. Clerk (born 1931). [42][43][44] N. T. Clerk was also a trained pianist and a flautist. [4]
Death[edit]
He died on 22 September 2012 of natural causes.[1] He was buried at the Basel Mission Cemetery at Osu, Accra.[1]
Selected works[edit]

Clerk, N. T. (1972) Bureaucracy and the One-party State: Politics and Administrative Transformation in Ghana [45]
Clerk, N. T. & Dabi-Dankwa, S.N.O. (1988) Half a century of secondary school education by the Presbyterian Church : the story of Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School, Odumase Krobo / Legon golden jubilee, 1938-1988 [46]
Clerk, N. T. (1990) Report of the Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission, 1989-1990 / Vol. 1, Main report. Entebbe: Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs [3]

References[edit]


^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v "PRESEC | ALUMINI PORTAL". 2016-11-11. Archived from the original on 11 November 2016. Retrieved 2017-06-11. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ a b c d "70 years of excellent secondary education" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 22 July 2011. 
^ a b c Uganda; Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission; Clerk, Nicholas T; Uganda; Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs (1990). Report of the Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission, 1989-1990 Vol. 1, Vol. 1,. Entebbe: Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Obituary: The Rev. Dr. Nicholas Timothy Clerk. Accra: Christian Messenger: Presbyterian Church of Ghana Funeral Bulletin. 27 October 2012. 
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (1954-08-26). Jet. Johnson Publishing Company. 
^ a b Clerk, Nicholas, T. (5 June 1982). Obituary: The Reverend Carl Henry Clerk. Accra: Presbyterian Church of Ghana, Funeral Bulletin. 
^ "FamilySearch.org". familysearch.org. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Presbyterian Boys Boarding School, Osu Salem". www.osusalem.org. Retrieved 2017-07-06. 
^ "PRESEC | ALUMINI PORTAL". www.odadee.net (in Russian). Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-05-04. 
^ "Presbyterian College of Education (Akropong Akuapem) - T-TEL". www.t-tel.org. Archived from the original on 25 December 2015. Retrieved 2017-06-12. 
^ a b Anquandah, James (November 2006). Ghana-Caribbean Relations - From Slavery Times to Present: Lecture to the Ghana-Caribbean Association (PDF). Accra: National Commission. Archived (PDF) from the original on 30 July 2016. 
^ a b Debrunner, Hans W. (1965). Owura Nico, the Rev. Nicholas Timothy Clerk, 1862-1961: pioneer and church leader. Watervile Publishing House. 
^ Debrunner, Hans W. (1965). Owura Nico, the Rev. Nicholas Timothy Clerk, 1862-1961: pioneer and church leader. Watervile Publishing House. 
^ Debrunner, Hans W. (1967). A history of Christianity in Ghana,. Waterville Pub. House. Archived from the original on 3 July 2013. 
^ Sill, Ulrike (2010). Encounters in Quest of Christian Womanhood: The Basel Mission in Pre- and Early Colonial Ghana. BRILL. ISBN 9004188886. 
^ a b c "Clerk, Nicholas Timothy, Ghana, Basel Mission". www.dacb.org. Archived from the original on 28 March 2016. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Goold, David. "Dictionary of Scottish Architects - DSA Architect Biography Report (June 11, 2017, 7:51 pm)". www.scottisharchitects.org.uk. Archived from the original on 7 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Ofori-Mensah. "22 Successful Ghanaians Who Went To Achimota School". OMGVoice. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Profile of THEODORE SHEALTIEL CLERK". MyHeritage.com. Archived from the original on 7 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Jr, Adell Patton (1996-04-13). Physicians, Colonial Racism, and Diaspora in West Africa (1st edition ed.). Gainesville: University Press of Florida. p. 29. ISBN 9780813014326. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. CS1 maint: Extra text (link)
^ "Janus: Progress in the Colonies, 1940s-1950s". janus.lib.cam.ac.uk. Retrieved 2017-06-06. 
^ "Official Web Site for the Judicial Service of the Republic of Ghana". 2005-04-14. Archived from the original on 14 April 2005. Retrieved 2017-06-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "Countries Ga-Gi". rulers.org. Archived from the original on 3 April 2007. Retrieved 2017-06-06. 
^ "Nathan Quao to be given state burial on April 8". ModernGhana.com. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Nathan Quao to be given state burial on April 8". www.ghanaweb.com. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Former Bank of Ghana Governor buried at La". www.ghanaweb.com. Archived from the original on 21 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-22. 
^ "Dr Amon Nikoi, Former Governor of the Bank of Ghana". www.ghanaweb.com. Archived from the original on 27 October 2016. Retrieved 2017-04-22. 
^ ":: Sleep Medicine Services ::". www.sleepmedicineservice.com. Archived from the original on 2016-01-25. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alexander Clerk, MD - San Jose, CA - Psychiatry & Sleep Medicine | Healthgrades.com". www.healthgrades.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-12. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Alexander A. Clerk, MD: Sleep Medicine, Psychiatry". doctor.webmd.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-12. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Alex A. Clerk, M.D. - Physicians Medical Group of San Jose". Physicians Medical Group of San Jose. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, Psychiatry - San Jose , CA |". Sharecare. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, MD – San Jose, CA | Psychiatry on Doximity". Doximity. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, MD | San Jose, CA | Psychiatrist". www.vitals.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk MD: Psychiatry, San Jose, CA". U.S. News. Archived from the original on 12 April 2017. Retrieved 12 April 2017. 
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (1992-07-01). Ebony. Johnson Publishing Company. [permanent dead link]
^ "Mr Nicholas Clerk: Obstetrics and gynaecology". finder.bupa.co.uk. Archived from the original on 6 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ "Mr Nick Clerk | Consultant Gynaecologist | Spire Healthcare". www.spirehealthcare.com. Retrieved 2017-04-22. [permanent dead link]
^ "Announcement: Join PATH at the American Society of Tropical Medicine and Hygiene conference - PATH". www.path.org. Archived from the original on 26 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-26. 
^ PATH (November 2012). "Guiding product development of malaria diagnostics to support elimination programs: The Target Product Profile" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 27 April 2017. 
^ PATH (November 2012). "Zambia Trip Report: Project DIAMETER (Diagnostics for Malaria Elimination Toward Eradication)" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 26 April 2017. 
^ "Contact Us | Department of Botany". webcache.googleusercontent.com. Archived from the original on 29 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "Membership". gaas-gh.org. Archived from the original on 29 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ "Fellowship". gaas-gh.org. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ Clerk, Nicholas Timothy (1972). Bureaucracy and the One-party State: Politics and Administrative Transformation in Ghana. University of Southern California. 
^ Clerk, Nicholas T; Dabi-Dankwa, Seth N. O (1988). Half a century of secondary school education by the Presbyterian Church: the story of Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School, Odumase Krobo/Legon golden jubilee, 1938-1988. Place of publication not identified: publisher not identified. 




Christianity portal












 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Nicholas_T._Clerk&oldid=792098212"					
Categories: 1930 births2012 deathsDeaths from prostate cancerAfro-JamaicanClerk (surname)Ga-Adangbe peopleGhanaian educatorsGhanaian academicsGhanaian people of Danish descentGhanaian people of German descent20th-century Presbyterian ministersPresbyterian ministersGhanaian PresbyteriansGhanaian ProtestantsAcademics of the Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and TechnologyAlumni of the University of LeicesterAlumni of the University of LondonPeople from AccraUniversity of Ghana alumniUniversity of Southern California alumniUSC Sol Price School of Public Policy alumniPresbyterian Boys' Senior High School alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 Russian-language sources (ru)CS1 maint: Extra textAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksEngvarB from June 2017Use dmy dates from June 2017 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 13:01.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Nicholas T. Clerk - Wikipedia





















 






Nicholas T. Clerk

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Nicholas Timothy Clerk


Born
(1930-03-03)3 March 1930
Adawso, Gold Coast


Died
22 September 2012(2012-09-22) (aged 82)
Accra, Ghana


Nationality



British subject (1930 - 1957)
Ghanaian (1957 - 2012)





Fields



Public administration
Public policy





Institutions
GIMPA


Education



Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School
Presbyterian Training College, Akropong
University of Leicester / University of London (BA, PGCE)
University of Southern California (MPA, DPA)
Trinity Theological Seminary (Dipl.-Theol.)





Known for
Contributions to public administration and public policy


Nicholas Timothy Clerk (3 March 1930 - † 22 September 2012) was a Ghanaian academic, public administrator and Presbyterian minister who served as the Rector of the Ghana Institute of Management and Public Administration (GIMPA), the country’s premier graduate school of public policy, public administration and governance.[1][2] He was also the Vice-Chairman of the Public Services Commission of Ghana.[1][2] Clerk chaired the Public Services Commission of Uganda from 1989 to 1990.[1][3][4]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career
3 Family
4 Personal life
5 Death
6 Selected works
7 References



Early life and education[edit]
He was born on 3 March 1930 in Adawso in the Eastern Region of Ghana.[1] His father, Carl Henry Clerk (1895 - 1982) was an agricultural educator, journalist, editor and Presbyterian minister who was elected the Fourth Synod Clerk of the Presbyterian Church of the Gold Coast from 1950 to 1954.[5][6] Clerk was also the Editor of the Christian Messenger, the news magazine of the Presbyterian Church of Ghana from 1960 to 1963.[6] Clerk's mother, Martha Ayorkor Quao (1912-1989) hailed from La and Ga Mashie.[7] He had his primary education at Presbyterian schools at Kpong, Odumase Krobo, Somanya and Osu according to teaching positngs of his father.[1][4] He attended the middle boarding school, The Salem School at Osu from 1942 to 1945. [1][8] He had his secondary education the Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School (Presec), Odumase-Krobo where he was the Senior Prefect in 1949. [1] He received theology and pedagogy training at the Presbyterian Training College, Akropong.[1] The college was founded by the Basel Mission in 1848 as the second oldest higher educational institution in West Africa after Fourah Bay College which was established in 1827.[9][10] He won a colonial scholarship to study English literature at the University of Leicester, then part of the University of London external system, receiving his honours bachelor's degree in 1955. [1][4] In order to qualify as an education officer, he obtained his professional certification, a Postgraduate Certificate in Education, from the Institute of Education at the University College of Ghana, also an affiliate of the University of London external system at the time. [1][4] He later attended the University of Southern California on a fellowship where he obtained a master’s degree and a doctorate in public administration.[1] He also earned a diploma in theology from the Trinity Theological Seminary and was ordained a Presbyterian minister.[1]
Career[edit]
In his early career, he was a teacher at this alma mater, Presbyterian Boys Secondary School (Presec), Odumase-Krobo, the Government Training College at Peki and Tamale and at the Department of Liberal Arts at the Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology.[1] He was later recruited as a lecturer at the then newly established Ghana Institute of Management and Public Administration (GIMPA) in 1962 and rose through the ranks to become the Rector of the Institute. [1][4] He was re-assigned by the PNDC government to the Public Services Commission of Ghana and later became the Vice-Chairman.[1] Between 1989 and 1990, he was appointed by the United Nations Development Programme to be the Chairman of the Public Services Commission of Uganda, a role in which he reviewed, reorganized and reformed the Ugandan public service. [1][3] He performed similar roles in his capacity as a public services, management and health administration consultant in other African countries including Botswana, Kenya, Liberia, Morocco, Nigeria, Sierra Leone, Tanzania and The Gambia. [1][4] He worked with the Presbyterian Church of Ghana in a senior administrative capacity at its headquarters and was also a lecturer at the Trinity Theological Seminary, Legon where he taught church management and administration courses. [1][4] For a long time, he was also the minister in charge of the Presbyterian church in Nungua. [1][4]
Family[edit]
Nicholas Timothy Clerk was a fourth generation member of the historically important Clerk family of Accra, Ghana.[2][11] His paternal great-grandfather, Alexander Worthy Clerk (1820 - 1906), a Jamaican Moravian missionary who arrived in the Danish Protectorate of Christiansborg (now the suburb of Osu) in Accra in the Gold Coast in 1843, as part of the original group of 24 West Indian missionaries who worked under the auspices of the Basel Evangelical Missionary Society of Basel, Switzerland.[12][13][14][11] A.W. Clerk was a pioneer of the Presbyterian Church of Ghana and a leader in education in colonial Ghana, establishing a boarding middle school, The Salem School in 1843. His paternal great-grandmother, Pauline Hesse was from the Gold Coast, and was of German and Ga-Dangme heritage.[15] His grandfather was Nicholas Timothy Clerk (1862 -1961), a Basel-trained theologian and missionary who was the First Synod Clerk of the Presbyterian Church of the Gold Coast from 1918 to 1932.[16][12] N. T. Clerk was a founding father of the all boys’ boarding high school, Presbyterian Boys’ Secondary School established in 1938.[1][2] His grandmother, Anna Alice Meyer (1873 -1934) was of Ga-Dangme and Danish descent.[16][16]
His uncle, Theodore S. Clerk (1909 -1965) was the first African architect of the Gold Coast who planned and developed the port city of Tema.[17][18][19] His aunt, Matilda J. Clerk (1916 -1984) was the second Ghanaian woman to become a physician.[20] His granduncle, Emmanuel Charles Quist (1880 -1959), a barrister and judge became the first African President of the Legislative Council from 1949 to 1951, Speaker of the National Assembly of the Gold Coast from 1951 to 1957, and Speaker of the National Assembly of Ghana from 1957 to 1959.[21]
Maternally, Clerk’s uncle was the Ghanaian barrister and judge, Nii Amaa Ollennu (1906 - 1986) who was elected the Speaker of the Parliament of Ghana during the Second Republic as well as serving as the Chairman of the Presidential Commission and acting President of Ghana from 7 August 1970 to 31 August 1970.[22][23] His other maternal uncle was Nathan Quao (1915 - 2005), a diplomat, educationist and public servant who rose to become a presidential advisor on governance to the governments of several Heads of State of Ghana.[24][25] In addition, his first cousin was also the Ghanaian economist and diplomat, Amon Nikoi (1930 - 2002) who was the Governor of the Bank of Ghana from 1973 to 1977 and Finance minister from 1979 to 1981.[26][27] He was also the cousin of Alexander Adu Clerk (born 1947), the sleep medicine specialist and psychiatrist. [28][29][30][31][32][33][34][35][36]
Personal life[edit]
Clerk had six children including Nicholas T. Clerk, Jr. (born 1963), a consultant obstetrician-gynaecologist, with a specialty in ambulatory gynaecology [37][38] and Christine A. Clerk (born 1967), an epidemiologist and a malaria specialist. [39][40][41] His younger brother is the Ghanaian botanist, George C. Clerk (born 1931). [42][43][44] N. T. Clerk was also a trained pianist and a flautist. [4]
Death[edit]
He died on 22 September 2012 of natural causes.[1] He was buried at the Basel Mission Cemetery at Osu, Accra.[1]
Selected works[edit]

Clerk, N. T. (1972) Bureaucracy and the One-party State: Politics and Administrative Transformation in Ghana [45]
Clerk, N. T. & Dabi-Dankwa, S.N.O. (1988) Half a century of secondary school education by the Presbyterian Church : the story of Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School, Odumase Krobo / Legon golden jubilee, 1938-1988 [46]
Clerk, N. T. (1990) Report of the Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission, 1989-1990 / Vol. 1, Main report. Entebbe: Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs [3]

References[edit]


^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v "PRESEC | ALUMINI PORTAL". 2016-11-11. Archived from the original on 11 November 2016. Retrieved 2017-06-11. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ a b c d "70 years of excellent secondary education" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 22 July 2011. 
^ a b c Uganda; Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission; Clerk, Nicholas T; Uganda; Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs (1990). Report of the Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission, 1989-1990 Vol. 1, Vol. 1,. Entebbe: Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Obituary: The Rev. Dr. Nicholas Timothy Clerk. Accra: Christian Messenger: Presbyterian Church of Ghana Funeral Bulletin. 27 October 2012. 
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (1954-08-26). Jet. Johnson Publishing Company. 
^ a b Clerk, Nicholas, T. (5 June 1982). Obituary: The Reverend Carl Henry Clerk. Accra: Presbyterian Church of Ghana, Funeral Bulletin. 
^ "FamilySearch.org". familysearch.org. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Presbyterian Boys Boarding School, Osu Salem". www.osusalem.org. Retrieved 2017-07-06. 
^ "PRESEC | ALUMINI PORTAL". www.odadee.net (in Russian). Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-05-04. 
^ "Presbyterian College of Education (Akropong Akuapem) - T-TEL". www.t-tel.org. Archived from the original on 25 December 2015. Retrieved 2017-06-12. 
^ a b Anquandah, James (November 2006). Ghana-Caribbean Relations - From Slavery Times to Present: Lecture to the Ghana-Caribbean Association (PDF). Accra: National Commission. Archived (PDF) from the original on 30 July 2016. 
^ a b Debrunner, Hans W. (1965). Owura Nico, the Rev. Nicholas Timothy Clerk, 1862-1961: pioneer and church leader. Watervile Publishing House. 
^ Debrunner, Hans W. (1965). Owura Nico, the Rev. Nicholas Timothy Clerk, 1862-1961: pioneer and church leader. Watervile Publishing House. 
^ Debrunner, Hans W. (1967). A history of Christianity in Ghana,. Waterville Pub. House. Archived from the original on 3 July 2013. 
^ Sill, Ulrike (2010). Encounters in Quest of Christian Womanhood: The Basel Mission in Pre- and Early Colonial Ghana. BRILL. ISBN 9004188886. 
^ a b c "Clerk, Nicholas Timothy, Ghana, Basel Mission". www.dacb.org. Archived from the original on 28 March 2016. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Goold, David. "Dictionary of Scottish Architects - DSA Architect Biography Report (June 11, 2017, 7:51 pm)". www.scottisharchitects.org.uk. Archived from the original on 7 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Ofori-Mensah. "22 Successful Ghanaians Who Went To Achimota School". OMGVoice. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Profile of THEODORE SHEALTIEL CLERK". MyHeritage.com. Archived from the original on 7 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Jr, Adell Patton (1996-04-13). Physicians, Colonial Racism, and Diaspora in West Africa (1st edition ed.). Gainesville: University Press of Florida. p. 29. ISBN 9780813014326. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. CS1 maint: Extra text (link)
^ "Janus: Progress in the Colonies, 1940s-1950s". janus.lib.cam.ac.uk. Retrieved 2017-06-06. 
^ "Official Web Site for the Judicial Service of the Republic of Ghana". 2005-04-14. Archived from the original on 14 April 2005. Retrieved 2017-06-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "Countries Ga-Gi". rulers.org. Archived from the original on 3 April 2007. Retrieved 2017-06-06. 
^ "Nathan Quao to be given state burial on April 8". ModernGhana.com. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Nathan Quao to be given state burial on April 8". www.ghanaweb.com. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Former Bank of Ghana Governor buried at La". www.ghanaweb.com. Archived from the original on 21 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-22. 
^ "Dr Amon Nikoi, Former Governor of the Bank of Ghana". www.ghanaweb.com. Archived from the original on 27 October 2016. Retrieved 2017-04-22. 
^ ":: Sleep Medicine Services ::". www.sleepmedicineservice.com. Archived from the original on 2016-01-25. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alexander Clerk, MD - San Jose, CA - Psychiatry & Sleep Medicine | Healthgrades.com". www.healthgrades.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-12. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Alexander A. Clerk, MD: Sleep Medicine, Psychiatry". doctor.webmd.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-12. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Alex A. Clerk, M.D. - Physicians Medical Group of San Jose". Physicians Medical Group of San Jose. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, Psychiatry - San Jose , CA |". Sharecare. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, MD – San Jose, CA | Psychiatry on Doximity". Doximity. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, MD | San Jose, CA | Psychiatrist". www.vitals.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk MD: Psychiatry, San Jose, CA". U.S. News. Archived from the original on 12 April 2017. Retrieved 12 April 2017. 
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (1992-07-01). Ebony. Johnson Publishing Company. [permanent dead link]
^ "Mr Nicholas Clerk: Obstetrics and gynaecology". finder.bupa.co.uk. Archived from the original on 6 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ "Mr Nick Clerk | Consultant Gynaecologist | Spire Healthcare". www.spirehealthcare.com. Retrieved 2017-04-22. [permanent dead link]
^ "Announcement: Join PATH at the American Society of Tropical Medicine and Hygiene conference - PATH". www.path.org. Archived from the original on 26 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-26. 
^ PATH (November 2012). "Guiding product development of malaria diagnostics to support elimination programs: The Target Product Profile" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 27 April 2017. 
^ PATH (November 2012). "Zambia Trip Report: Project DIAMETER (Diagnostics for Malaria Elimination Toward Eradication)" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 26 April 2017. 
^ "Contact Us | Department of Botany". webcache.googleusercontent.com. Archived from the original on 29 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "Membership". gaas-gh.org. Archived from the original on 29 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ "Fellowship". gaas-gh.org. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ Clerk, Nicholas Timothy (1972). Bureaucracy and the One-party State: Politics and Administrative Transformation in Ghana. University of Southern California. 
^ Clerk, Nicholas T; Dabi-Dankwa, Seth N. O (1988). Half a century of secondary school education by the Presbyterian Church: the story of Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School, Odumase Krobo/Legon golden jubilee, 1938-1988. Place of publication not identified: publisher not identified. 




Christianity portal












 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Nicholas_T._Clerk&oldid=792098212"					
Categories: 1930 births2012 deathsDeaths from prostate cancerAfro-JamaicanClerk (surname)Ga-Adangbe peopleGhanaian educatorsGhanaian academicsGhanaian people of Danish descentGhanaian people of German descent20th-century Presbyterian ministersPresbyterian ministersGhanaian PresbyteriansGhanaian ProtestantsAcademics of the Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and TechnologyAlumni of the University of LeicesterAlumni of the University of LondonPeople from AccraUniversity of Ghana alumniUniversity of Southern California alumniUSC Sol Price School of Public Policy alumniPresbyterian Boys' Senior High School alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 Russian-language sources (ru)CS1 maint: Extra textAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksEngvarB from June 2017Use dmy dates from June 2017 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 13:01.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Nicholas T. Clerk - Wikipedia





















 






Nicholas T. Clerk

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Nicholas Timothy Clerk


Born
(1930-03-03)3 March 1930
Adawso, Gold Coast


Died
22 September 2012(2012-09-22) (aged 82)
Accra, Ghana


Nationality



British subject (1930 - 1957)
Ghanaian (1957 - 2012)





Fields



Public administration
Public policy





Institutions
GIMPA


Education



Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School
Presbyterian Training College, Akropong
University of Leicester / University of London (BA, PGCE)
University of Southern California (MPA, DPA)
Trinity Theological Seminary (Dipl.-Theol.)





Known for
Contributions to public administration and public policy


Nicholas Timothy Clerk (3 March 1930 - † 22 September 2012) was a Ghanaian academic, public administrator and Presbyterian minister who served as the Rector of the Ghana Institute of Management and Public Administration (GIMPA), the country’s premier graduate school of public policy, public administration and governance.[1][2] He was also the Vice-Chairman of the Public Services Commission of Ghana.[1][2] Clerk chaired the Public Services Commission of Uganda from 1989 to 1990.[1][3][4]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career
3 Family
4 Personal life
5 Death
6 Selected works
7 References



Early life and education[edit]
He was born on 3 March 1930 in Adawso in the Eastern Region of Ghana.[1] His father, Carl Henry Clerk (1895 - 1982) was an agricultural educator, journalist, editor and Presbyterian minister who was elected the Fourth Synod Clerk of the Presbyterian Church of the Gold Coast from 1950 to 1954.[5][6] Clerk was also the Editor of the Christian Messenger, the news magazine of the Presbyterian Church of Ghana from 1960 to 1963.[6] Clerk's mother, Martha Ayorkor Quao (1912-1989) hailed from La and Ga Mashie.[7] He had his primary education at Presbyterian schools at Kpong, Odumase Krobo, Somanya and Osu according to teaching positngs of his father.[1][4] He attended the middle boarding school, The Salem School at Osu from 1942 to 1945. [1][8] He had his secondary education the Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School (Presec), Odumase-Krobo where he was the Senior Prefect in 1949. [1] He received theology and pedagogy training at the Presbyterian Training College, Akropong.[1] The college was founded by the Basel Mission in 1848 as the second oldest higher educational institution in West Africa after Fourah Bay College which was established in 1827.[9][10] He won a colonial scholarship to study English literature at the University of Leicester, then part of the University of London external system, receiving his honours bachelor's degree in 1955. [1][4] In order to qualify as an education officer, he obtained his professional certification, a Postgraduate Certificate in Education, from the Institute of Education at the University College of Ghana, also an affiliate of the University of London external system at the time. [1][4] He later attended the University of Southern California on a fellowship where he obtained a master’s degree and a doctorate in public administration.[1] He also earned a diploma in theology from the Trinity Theological Seminary and was ordained a Presbyterian minister.[1]
Career[edit]
In his early career, he was a teacher at this alma mater, Presbyterian Boys Secondary School (Presec), Odumase-Krobo, the Government Training College at Peki and Tamale and at the Department of Liberal Arts at the Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology.[1] He was later recruited as a lecturer at the then newly established Ghana Institute of Management and Public Administration (GIMPA) in 1962 and rose through the ranks to become the Rector of the Institute. [1][4] He was re-assigned by the PNDC government to the Public Services Commission of Ghana and later became the Vice-Chairman.[1] Between 1989 and 1990, he was appointed by the United Nations Development Programme to be the Chairman of the Public Services Commission of Uganda, a role in which he reviewed, reorganized and reformed the Ugandan public service. [1][3] He performed similar roles in his capacity as a public services, management and health administration consultant in other African countries including Botswana, Kenya, Liberia, Morocco, Nigeria, Sierra Leone, Tanzania and The Gambia. [1][4] He worked with the Presbyterian Church of Ghana in a senior administrative capacity at its headquarters and was also a lecturer at the Trinity Theological Seminary, Legon where he taught church management and administration courses. [1][4] For a long time, he was also the minister in charge of the Presbyterian church in Nungua. [1][4]
Family[edit]
Nicholas Timothy Clerk was a fourth generation member of the historically important Clerk family of Accra, Ghana.[2][11] His paternal great-grandfather, Alexander Worthy Clerk (1820 - 1906), a Jamaican Moravian missionary who arrived in the Danish Protectorate of Christiansborg (now the suburb of Osu) in Accra in the Gold Coast in 1843, as part of the original group of 24 West Indian missionaries who worked under the auspices of the Basel Evangelical Missionary Society of Basel, Switzerland.[12][13][14][11] A.W. Clerk was a pioneer of the Presbyterian Church of Ghana and a leader in education in colonial Ghana, establishing a boarding middle school, The Salem School in 1843. His paternal great-grandmother, Pauline Hesse was from the Gold Coast, and was of German and Ga-Dangme heritage.[15] His grandfather was Nicholas Timothy Clerk (1862 -1961), a Basel-trained theologian and missionary who was the First Synod Clerk of the Presbyterian Church of the Gold Coast from 1918 to 1932.[16][12] N. T. Clerk was a founding father of the all boys’ boarding high school, Presbyterian Boys’ Secondary School established in 1938.[1][2] His grandmother, Anna Alice Meyer (1873 -1934) was of Ga-Dangme and Danish descent.[16][16]
His uncle, Theodore S. Clerk (1909 -1965) was the first African architect of the Gold Coast who planned and developed the port city of Tema.[17][18][19] His aunt, Matilda J. Clerk (1916 -1984) was the second Ghanaian woman to become a physician.[20] His granduncle, Emmanuel Charles Quist (1880 -1959), a barrister and judge became the first African President of the Legislative Council from 1949 to 1951, Speaker of the National Assembly of the Gold Coast from 1951 to 1957, and Speaker of the National Assembly of Ghana from 1957 to 1959.[21]
Maternally, Clerk’s uncle was the Ghanaian barrister and judge, Nii Amaa Ollennu (1906 - 1986) who was elected the Speaker of the Parliament of Ghana during the Second Republic as well as serving as the Chairman of the Presidential Commission and acting President of Ghana from 7 August 1970 to 31 August 1970.[22][23] His other maternal uncle was Nathan Quao (1915 - 2005), a diplomat, educationist and public servant who rose to become a presidential advisor on governance to the governments of several Heads of State of Ghana.[24][25] In addition, his first cousin was also the Ghanaian economist and diplomat, Amon Nikoi (1930 - 2002) who was the Governor of the Bank of Ghana from 1973 to 1977 and Finance minister from 1979 to 1981.[26][27] He was also the cousin of Alexander Adu Clerk (born 1947), the sleep medicine specialist and psychiatrist. [28][29][30][31][32][33][34][35][36]
Personal life[edit]
Clerk had six children including Nicholas T. Clerk, Jr. (born 1963), a consultant obstetrician-gynaecologist, with a specialty in ambulatory gynaecology [37][38] and Christine A. Clerk (born 1967), an epidemiologist and a malaria specialist. [39][40][41] His younger brother is the Ghanaian botanist, George C. Clerk (born 1931). [42][43][44] N. T. Clerk was also a trained pianist and a flautist. [4]
Death[edit]
He died on 22 September 2012 of natural causes.[1] He was buried at the Basel Mission Cemetery at Osu, Accra.[1]
Selected works[edit]

Clerk, N. T. (1972) Bureaucracy and the One-party State: Politics and Administrative Transformation in Ghana [45]
Clerk, N. T. & Dabi-Dankwa, S.N.O. (1988) Half a century of secondary school education by the Presbyterian Church : the story of Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School, Odumase Krobo / Legon golden jubilee, 1938-1988 [46]
Clerk, N. T. (1990) Report of the Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission, 1989-1990 / Vol. 1, Main report. Entebbe: Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs [3]

References[edit]


^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v "PRESEC | ALUMINI PORTAL". 2016-11-11. Archived from the original on 11 November 2016. Retrieved 2017-06-11. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ a b c d "70 years of excellent secondary education" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 22 July 2011. 
^ a b c Uganda; Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission; Clerk, Nicholas T; Uganda; Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs (1990). Report of the Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission, 1989-1990 Vol. 1, Vol. 1,. Entebbe: Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Obituary: The Rev. Dr. Nicholas Timothy Clerk. Accra: Christian Messenger: Presbyterian Church of Ghana Funeral Bulletin. 27 October 2012. 
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (1954-08-26). Jet. Johnson Publishing Company. 
^ a b Clerk, Nicholas, T. (5 June 1982). Obituary: The Reverend Carl Henry Clerk. Accra: Presbyterian Church of Ghana, Funeral Bulletin. 
^ "FamilySearch.org". familysearch.org. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Presbyterian Boys Boarding School, Osu Salem". www.osusalem.org. Retrieved 2017-07-06. 
^ "PRESEC | ALUMINI PORTAL". www.odadee.net (in Russian). Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-05-04. 
^ "Presbyterian College of Education (Akropong Akuapem) - T-TEL". www.t-tel.org. Archived from the original on 25 December 2015. Retrieved 2017-06-12. 
^ a b Anquandah, James (November 2006). Ghana-Caribbean Relations - From Slavery Times to Present: Lecture to the Ghana-Caribbean Association (PDF). Accra: National Commission. Archived (PDF) from the original on 30 July 2016. 
^ a b Debrunner, Hans W. (1965). Owura Nico, the Rev. Nicholas Timothy Clerk, 1862-1961: pioneer and church leader. Watervile Publishing House. 
^ Debrunner, Hans W. (1965). Owura Nico, the Rev. Nicholas Timothy Clerk, 1862-1961: pioneer and church leader. Watervile Publishing House. 
^ Debrunner, Hans W. (1967). A history of Christianity in Ghana,. Waterville Pub. House. Archived from the original on 3 July 2013. 
^ Sill, Ulrike (2010). Encounters in Quest of Christian Womanhood: The Basel Mission in Pre- and Early Colonial Ghana. BRILL. ISBN 9004188886. 
^ a b c "Clerk, Nicholas Timothy, Ghana, Basel Mission". www.dacb.org. Archived from the original on 28 March 2016. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Goold, David. "Dictionary of Scottish Architects - DSA Architect Biography Report (June 11, 2017, 7:51 pm)". www.scottisharchitects.org.uk. Archived from the original on 7 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Ofori-Mensah. "22 Successful Ghanaians Who Went To Achimota School". OMGVoice. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Profile of THEODORE SHEALTIEL CLERK". MyHeritage.com. Archived from the original on 7 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Jr, Adell Patton (1996-04-13). Physicians, Colonial Racism, and Diaspora in West Africa (1st edition ed.). Gainesville: University Press of Florida. p. 29. ISBN 9780813014326. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. CS1 maint: Extra text (link)
^ "Janus: Progress in the Colonies, 1940s-1950s". janus.lib.cam.ac.uk. Retrieved 2017-06-06. 
^ "Official Web Site for the Judicial Service of the Republic of Ghana". 2005-04-14. Archived from the original on 14 April 2005. Retrieved 2017-06-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "Countries Ga-Gi". rulers.org. Archived from the original on 3 April 2007. Retrieved 2017-06-06. 
^ "Nathan Quao to be given state burial on April 8". ModernGhana.com. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Nathan Quao to be given state burial on April 8". www.ghanaweb.com. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Former Bank of Ghana Governor buried at La". www.ghanaweb.com. Archived from the original on 21 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-22. 
^ "Dr Amon Nikoi, Former Governor of the Bank of Ghana". www.ghanaweb.com. Archived from the original on 27 October 2016. Retrieved 2017-04-22. 
^ ":: Sleep Medicine Services ::". www.sleepmedicineservice.com. Archived from the original on 2016-01-25. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alexander Clerk, MD - San Jose, CA - Psychiatry & Sleep Medicine | Healthgrades.com". www.healthgrades.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-12. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Alexander A. Clerk, MD: Sleep Medicine, Psychiatry". doctor.webmd.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-12. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Alex A. Clerk, M.D. - Physicians Medical Group of San Jose". Physicians Medical Group of San Jose. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, Psychiatry - San Jose , CA |". Sharecare. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, MD – San Jose, CA | Psychiatry on Doximity". Doximity. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, MD | San Jose, CA | Psychiatrist". www.vitals.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk MD: Psychiatry, San Jose, CA". U.S. News. Archived from the original on 12 April 2017. Retrieved 12 April 2017. 
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (1992-07-01). Ebony. Johnson Publishing Company. [permanent dead link]
^ "Mr Nicholas Clerk: Obstetrics and gynaecology". finder.bupa.co.uk. Archived from the original on 6 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ "Mr Nick Clerk | Consultant Gynaecologist | Spire Healthcare". www.spirehealthcare.com. Retrieved 2017-04-22. [permanent dead link]
^ "Announcement: Join PATH at the American Society of Tropical Medicine and Hygiene conference - PATH". www.path.org. Archived from the original on 26 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-26. 
^ PATH (November 2012). "Guiding product development of malaria diagnostics to support elimination programs: The Target Product Profile" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 27 April 2017. 
^ PATH (November 2012). "Zambia Trip Report: Project DIAMETER (Diagnostics for Malaria Elimination Toward Eradication)" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 26 April 2017. 
^ "Contact Us | Department of Botany". webcache.googleusercontent.com. Archived from the original on 29 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "Membership". gaas-gh.org. Archived from the original on 29 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ "Fellowship". gaas-gh.org. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ Clerk, Nicholas Timothy (1972). Bureaucracy and the One-party State: Politics and Administrative Transformation in Ghana. University of Southern California. 
^ Clerk, Nicholas T; Dabi-Dankwa, Seth N. O (1988). Half a century of secondary school education by the Presbyterian Church: the story of Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School, Odumase Krobo/Legon golden jubilee, 1938-1988. Place of publication not identified: publisher not identified. 




Christianity portal












 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Nicholas_T._Clerk&oldid=792098212"					
Categories: 1930 births2012 deathsDeaths from prostate cancerAfro-JamaicanClerk (surname)Ga-Adangbe peopleGhanaian educatorsGhanaian academicsGhanaian people of Danish descentGhanaian people of German descent20th-century Presbyterian ministersPresbyterian ministersGhanaian PresbyteriansGhanaian ProtestantsAcademics of the Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and TechnologyAlumni of the University of LeicesterAlumni of the University of LondonPeople from AccraUniversity of Ghana alumniUniversity of Southern California alumniUSC Sol Price School of Public Policy alumniPresbyterian Boys' Senior High School alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 Russian-language sources (ru)CS1 maint: Extra textAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksEngvarB from June 2017Use dmy dates from June 2017 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 13:01.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Nicholas T. Clerk - Wikipedia





















 






Nicholas T. Clerk

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Nicholas Timothy Clerk


Born
(1930-03-03)3 March 1930
Adawso, Gold Coast


Died
22 September 2012(2012-09-22) (aged 82)
Accra, Ghana


Nationality



British subject (1930 - 1957)
Ghanaian (1957 - 2012)





Fields



Public administration
Public policy





Institutions
GIMPA


Education



Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School
Presbyterian Training College, Akropong
University of Leicester / University of London (BA, PGCE)
University of Southern California (MPA, DPA)
Trinity Theological Seminary (Dipl.-Theol.)





Known for
Contributions to public administration and public policy


Nicholas Timothy Clerk (3 March 1930 - † 22 September 2012) was a Ghanaian academic, public administrator and Presbyterian minister who served as the Rector of the Ghana Institute of Management and Public Administration (GIMPA), the country’s premier graduate school of public policy, public administration and governance.[1][2] He was also the Vice-Chairman of the Public Services Commission of Ghana.[1][2] Clerk chaired the Public Services Commission of Uganda from 1989 to 1990.[1][3][4]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Career
3 Family
4 Personal life
5 Death
6 Selected works
7 References



Early life and education[edit]
He was born on 3 March 1930 in Adawso in the Eastern Region of Ghana.[1] His father, Carl Henry Clerk (1895 - 1982) was an agricultural educator, journalist, editor and Presbyterian minister who was elected the Fourth Synod Clerk of the Presbyterian Church of the Gold Coast from 1950 to 1954.[5][6] Clerk was also the Editor of the Christian Messenger, the news magazine of the Presbyterian Church of Ghana from 1960 to 1963.[6] Clerk's mother, Martha Ayorkor Quao (1912-1989) hailed from La and Ga Mashie.[7] He had his primary education at Presbyterian schools at Kpong, Odumase Krobo, Somanya and Osu according to teaching positngs of his father.[1][4] He attended the middle boarding school, The Salem School at Osu from 1942 to 1945. [1][8] He had his secondary education the Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School (Presec), Odumase-Krobo where he was the Senior Prefect in 1949. [1] He received theology and pedagogy training at the Presbyterian Training College, Akropong.[1] The college was founded by the Basel Mission in 1848 as the second oldest higher educational institution in West Africa after Fourah Bay College which was established in 1827.[9][10] He won a colonial scholarship to study English literature at the University of Leicester, then part of the University of London external system, receiving his honours bachelor's degree in 1955. [1][4] In order to qualify as an education officer, he obtained his professional certification, a Postgraduate Certificate in Education, from the Institute of Education at the University College of Ghana, also an affiliate of the University of London external system at the time. [1][4] He later attended the University of Southern California on a fellowship where he obtained a master’s degree and a doctorate in public administration.[1] He also earned a diploma in theology from the Trinity Theological Seminary and was ordained a Presbyterian minister.[1]
Career[edit]
In his early career, he was a teacher at this alma mater, Presbyterian Boys Secondary School (Presec), Odumase-Krobo, the Government Training College at Peki and Tamale and at the Department of Liberal Arts at the Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and Technology.[1] He was later recruited as a lecturer at the then newly established Ghana Institute of Management and Public Administration (GIMPA) in 1962 and rose through the ranks to become the Rector of the Institute. [1][4] He was re-assigned by the PNDC government to the Public Services Commission of Ghana and later became the Vice-Chairman.[1] Between 1989 and 1990, he was appointed by the United Nations Development Programme to be the Chairman of the Public Services Commission of Uganda, a role in which he reviewed, reorganized and reformed the Ugandan public service. [1][3] He performed similar roles in his capacity as a public services, management and health administration consultant in other African countries including Botswana, Kenya, Liberia, Morocco, Nigeria, Sierra Leone, Tanzania and The Gambia. [1][4] He worked with the Presbyterian Church of Ghana in a senior administrative capacity at its headquarters and was also a lecturer at the Trinity Theological Seminary, Legon where he taught church management and administration courses. [1][4] For a long time, he was also the minister in charge of the Presbyterian church in Nungua. [1][4]
Family[edit]
Nicholas Timothy Clerk was a fourth generation member of the historically important Clerk family of Accra, Ghana.[2][11] His paternal great-grandfather, Alexander Worthy Clerk (1820 - 1906), a Jamaican Moravian missionary who arrived in the Danish Protectorate of Christiansborg (now the suburb of Osu) in Accra in the Gold Coast in 1843, as part of the original group of 24 West Indian missionaries who worked under the auspices of the Basel Evangelical Missionary Society of Basel, Switzerland.[12][13][14][11] A.W. Clerk was a pioneer of the Presbyterian Church of Ghana and a leader in education in colonial Ghana, establishing a boarding middle school, The Salem School in 1843. His paternal great-grandmother, Pauline Hesse was from the Gold Coast, and was of German and Ga-Dangme heritage.[15] His grandfather was Nicholas Timothy Clerk (1862 -1961), a Basel-trained theologian and missionary who was the First Synod Clerk of the Presbyterian Church of the Gold Coast from 1918 to 1932.[16][12] N. T. Clerk was a founding father of the all boys’ boarding high school, Presbyterian Boys’ Secondary School established in 1938.[1][2] His grandmother, Anna Alice Meyer (1873 -1934) was of Ga-Dangme and Danish descent.[16][16]
His uncle, Theodore S. Clerk (1909 -1965) was the first African architect of the Gold Coast who planned and developed the port city of Tema.[17][18][19] His aunt, Matilda J. Clerk (1916 -1984) was the second Ghanaian woman to become a physician.[20] His granduncle, Emmanuel Charles Quist (1880 -1959), a barrister and judge became the first African President of the Legislative Council from 1949 to 1951, Speaker of the National Assembly of the Gold Coast from 1951 to 1957, and Speaker of the National Assembly of Ghana from 1957 to 1959.[21]
Maternally, Clerk’s uncle was the Ghanaian barrister and judge, Nii Amaa Ollennu (1906 - 1986) who was elected the Speaker of the Parliament of Ghana during the Second Republic as well as serving as the Chairman of the Presidential Commission and acting President of Ghana from 7 August 1970 to 31 August 1970.[22][23] His other maternal uncle was Nathan Quao (1915 - 2005), a diplomat, educationist and public servant who rose to become a presidential advisor on governance to the governments of several Heads of State of Ghana.[24][25] In addition, his first cousin was also the Ghanaian economist and diplomat, Amon Nikoi (1930 - 2002) who was the Governor of the Bank of Ghana from 1973 to 1977 and Finance minister from 1979 to 1981.[26][27] He was also the cousin of Alexander Adu Clerk (born 1947), the sleep medicine specialist and psychiatrist. [28][29][30][31][32][33][34][35][36]
Personal life[edit]
Clerk had six children including Nicholas T. Clerk, Jr. (born 1963), a consultant obstetrician-gynaecologist, with a specialty in ambulatory gynaecology [37][38] and Christine A. Clerk (born 1967), an epidemiologist and a malaria specialist. [39][40][41] His younger brother is the Ghanaian botanist, George C. Clerk (born 1931). [42][43][44] N. T. Clerk was also a trained pianist and a flautist. [4]
Death[edit]
He died on 22 September 2012 of natural causes.[1] He was buried at the Basel Mission Cemetery at Osu, Accra.[1]
Selected works[edit]

Clerk, N. T. (1972) Bureaucracy and the One-party State: Politics and Administrative Transformation in Ghana [45]
Clerk, N. T. & Dabi-Dankwa, S.N.O. (1988) Half a century of secondary school education by the Presbyterian Church : the story of Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School, Odumase Krobo / Legon golden jubilee, 1938-1988 [46]
Clerk, N. T. (1990) Report of the Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission, 1989-1990 / Vol. 1, Main report. Entebbe: Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs [3]

References[edit]


^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v "PRESEC | ALUMINI PORTAL". 2016-11-11. Archived from the original on 11 November 2016. Retrieved 2017-06-11. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ a b c d "70 years of excellent secondary education" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 22 July 2011. 
^ a b c Uganda; Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission; Clerk, Nicholas T; Uganda; Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs (1990). Report of the Public Service Review and Reorganization Commission, 1989-1990 Vol. 1, Vol. 1,. Entebbe: Ministry of Public Service and Cabinet Affairs. 
^ a b c d e f g h i Obituary: The Rev. Dr. Nicholas Timothy Clerk. Accra: Christian Messenger: Presbyterian Church of Ghana Funeral Bulletin. 27 October 2012. 
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (1954-08-26). Jet. Johnson Publishing Company. 
^ a b Clerk, Nicholas, T. (5 June 1982). Obituary: The Reverend Carl Henry Clerk. Accra: Presbyterian Church of Ghana, Funeral Bulletin. 
^ "FamilySearch.org". familysearch.org. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Presbyterian Boys Boarding School, Osu Salem". www.osusalem.org. Retrieved 2017-07-06. 
^ "PRESEC | ALUMINI PORTAL". www.odadee.net (in Russian). Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-05-04. 
^ "Presbyterian College of Education (Akropong Akuapem) - T-TEL". www.t-tel.org. Archived from the original on 25 December 2015. Retrieved 2017-06-12. 
^ a b Anquandah, James (November 2006). Ghana-Caribbean Relations - From Slavery Times to Present: Lecture to the Ghana-Caribbean Association (PDF). Accra: National Commission. Archived (PDF) from the original on 30 July 2016. 
^ a b Debrunner, Hans W. (1965). Owura Nico, the Rev. Nicholas Timothy Clerk, 1862-1961: pioneer and church leader. Watervile Publishing House. 
^ Debrunner, Hans W. (1965). Owura Nico, the Rev. Nicholas Timothy Clerk, 1862-1961: pioneer and church leader. Watervile Publishing House. 
^ Debrunner, Hans W. (1967). A history of Christianity in Ghana,. Waterville Pub. House. Archived from the original on 3 July 2013. 
^ Sill, Ulrike (2010). Encounters in Quest of Christian Womanhood: The Basel Mission in Pre- and Early Colonial Ghana. BRILL. ISBN 9004188886. 
^ a b c "Clerk, Nicholas Timothy, Ghana, Basel Mission". www.dacb.org. Archived from the original on 28 March 2016. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Goold, David. "Dictionary of Scottish Architects - DSA Architect Biography Report (June 11, 2017, 7:51 pm)". www.scottisharchitects.org.uk. Archived from the original on 7 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Ofori-Mensah. "22 Successful Ghanaians Who Went To Achimota School". OMGVoice. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Profile of THEODORE SHEALTIEL CLERK". MyHeritage.com. Archived from the original on 7 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ Jr, Adell Patton (1996-04-13). Physicians, Colonial Racism, and Diaspora in West Africa (1st edition ed.). Gainesville: University Press of Florida. p. 29. ISBN 9780813014326. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. CS1 maint: Extra text (link)
^ "Janus: Progress in the Colonies, 1940s-1950s". janus.lib.cam.ac.uk. Retrieved 2017-06-06. 
^ "Official Web Site for the Judicial Service of the Republic of Ghana". 2005-04-14. Archived from the original on 14 April 2005. Retrieved 2017-06-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "Countries Ga-Gi". rulers.org. Archived from the original on 3 April 2007. Retrieved 2017-06-06. 
^ "Nathan Quao to be given state burial on April 8". ModernGhana.com. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Nathan Quao to be given state burial on April 8". www.ghanaweb.com. Retrieved 2017-06-11. 
^ "Former Bank of Ghana Governor buried at La". www.ghanaweb.com. Archived from the original on 21 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-22. 
^ "Dr Amon Nikoi, Former Governor of the Bank of Ghana". www.ghanaweb.com. Archived from the original on 27 October 2016. Retrieved 2017-04-22. 
^ ":: Sleep Medicine Services ::". www.sleepmedicineservice.com. Archived from the original on 2016-01-25. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alexander Clerk, MD - San Jose, CA - Psychiatry & Sleep Medicine | Healthgrades.com". www.healthgrades.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-12. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Alexander A. Clerk, MD: Sleep Medicine, Psychiatry". doctor.webmd.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-12. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Alex A. Clerk, M.D. - Physicians Medical Group of San Jose". Physicians Medical Group of San Jose. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, Psychiatry - San Jose , CA |". Sharecare. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, MD – San Jose, CA | Psychiatry on Doximity". Doximity. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk, MD | San Jose, CA | Psychiatrist". www.vitals.com. Archived from the original on 2017-04-13. Retrieved 2017-04-12. 
^ "Dr. Alex Clerk MD: Psychiatry, San Jose, CA". U.S. News. Archived from the original on 12 April 2017. Retrieved 12 April 2017. 
^ Company, Johnson Publishing (1992-07-01). Ebony. Johnson Publishing Company. [permanent dead link]
^ "Mr Nicholas Clerk: Obstetrics and gynaecology". finder.bupa.co.uk. Archived from the original on 6 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ "Mr Nick Clerk | Consultant Gynaecologist | Spire Healthcare". www.spirehealthcare.com. Retrieved 2017-04-22. [permanent dead link]
^ "Announcement: Join PATH at the American Society of Tropical Medicine and Hygiene conference - PATH". www.path.org. Archived from the original on 26 April 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-26. 
^ PATH (November 2012). "Guiding product development of malaria diagnostics to support elimination programs: The Target Product Profile" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 27 April 2017. 
^ PATH (November 2012). "Zambia Trip Report: Project DIAMETER (Diagnostics for Malaria Elimination Toward Eradication)" (PDF). Archived (PDF) from the original on 26 April 2017. 
^ "Contact Us | Department of Botany". webcache.googleusercontent.com. Archived from the original on 29 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link)
^ "Membership". gaas-gh.org. Archived from the original on 29 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ "Fellowship". gaas-gh.org. Archived from the original on 30 March 2017. Retrieved 2017-04-05. 
^ Clerk, Nicholas Timothy (1972). Bureaucracy and the One-party State: Politics and Administrative Transformation in Ghana. University of Southern California. 
^ Clerk, Nicholas T; Dabi-Dankwa, Seth N. O (1988). Half a century of secondary school education by the Presbyterian Church: the story of Presbyterian Boys' Secondary School, Odumase Krobo/Legon golden jubilee, 1938-1988. Place of publication not identified: publisher not identified. 




Christianity portal












 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Nicholas_T._Clerk&oldid=792098212"					
Categories: 1930 births2012 deathsDeaths from prostate cancerAfro-JamaicanClerk (surname)Ga-Adangbe peopleGhanaian educatorsGhanaian academicsGhanaian people of Danish descentGhanaian people of German descent20th-century Presbyterian ministersPresbyterian ministersGhanaian PresbyteriansGhanaian ProtestantsAcademics of the Kwame Nkrumah University of Science and TechnologyAlumni of the University of LeicesterAlumni of the University of LondonPeople from AccraUniversity of Ghana alumniUniversity of Southern California alumniUSC Sol Price School of Public Policy alumniPresbyterian Boys' Senior High School alumniHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownCS1 Russian-language sources (ru)CS1 maint: Extra textAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from May 2017Articles with permanently dead external linksEngvarB from June 2017Use dmy dates from June 2017 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 24 July 2017, at 13:01.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









">
		

Nicholas T Andrews (Import & export history)
































 










Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French



 

Get global shipment alerts for Nicholas T Andrews, $9.95 /month

Processing, please wait ...







Cardholder's Name


Tell us your Full Name



Credit Card No. 








Enter a valid Card No.



Exp. Date

1 January
2 February
3 March
4 April
5 May
6 June
7 July
8 August
9 September
10 October
11 November
12 December




2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
2026



Postal Code / Zip


(or Postal Code if not in the USA)




  Terms of Service




Submit















			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 



Nicholas T Andrews

Nicholas T Andrews imports from Phan Thi Hong in Taiwan through the port of Long Beach        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Nicholas T Andrews and millions of other importers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database

 PEPSICO
 CVS PHARMACY INC
 ADIDAS INDUSTRIAL
 NISSAN MOTOR IBERICA SA
 TEXAS INSTRUMENTS CENTER
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Nicholas T Andrews
Nicholas T Andrews imports from Phan Thi Hong in Taiwan through the port of Long Beach


                                Bill of Lading                            





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



PHAN THI HONG
C/O SEKO GLOBAL LOGISTICS NETWORK 243-243B HOANG VAN THU STREET TAN BINH DISTRICT, HOCHIMINH CITY,


NICHOLAS T ANDREWS
1330 W MADISON, SUBURB: CHICAGO,CITY: ILLINOIS ZIPPOSTCODE: 60607,COUNTRY: USA



Notify Party
Marks and Numbers



NICHOLAS T ANDREWS
1330 W MADISON, SUBURB: CHICAGO,CITY: ILLINOIS ZIPPOSTCODE: 60607,COUNTRY: USA



NAME: NICHOLAS T ANDREWS
NAME: NICHOLAS T ANDREWS





Master Bill of Lading Number
Container Number










Product Description




VINTAGE VESPA STANDA VBB 150CC ITALY 
VINTAGE VESPA STANDA VBB 150CC ITALY 









Bill of LadingGBNS267291156Arrival Date2006-04-19Weight (LB)728Weight (KG)331UnitsCMQuantity331 KGVoyage No.N/APort of LoadingKAOHSIUNGPort of DischargeLONG BEACHVessel NameWAN HAI LINES LTDCarrier CodeGBNSCountry Of OriginTaiwan 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Nicholas T Andrews. Join Now 







How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Get e-mail alerts when Nicholas T Andrews has new shipments.                        

Processing, please wait ...









Submit












Contact Nicholas T Andrews







 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 





Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.








Nicholas T Andrews
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 109,970,574 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In





















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 

















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Coffee Capsules Inc. Dba Gourmesso                                



                                    Mary Claudine Genovese                                



                                    I-technology Srl                                



                                    Carpatho-rusyn Research Center, Inc                                



                                    Nb Jiangbei Gogo Knitting Products                                











                     
                                            109,970,574  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.5506
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X

















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          


















Amazon.com: Amazon Music Unlimited








































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Digital Music



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






 Amazon Music Unlimited Prime Music CDs & Vinyl Download Store         Open Web Player MP3 cart Settings













































































































$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          
















Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.
















Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).
















Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More


























Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          

















There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started

















v



























Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          







 






Long Nicholas Found! | Check For Arrests, Warrants 










































 


 





 Long Nicholas Found!!  Check For Arrests, Warrants 
    Show Me Long's Records 





 Please take into consideration that Long Nicholas's records can only be used for personal reasons. For example locating old friends and family or verifying if a person has criminal history and if they can be trusted, to name a few.

You cannot use these records for consumer credit, tenant screening, employment, insurance qualifications or anything else that may be subjected to the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 USC 1681 et seq.
Long Nicholas's records do not contain credit scores and reports. We and our partners are not a consumer reporting agency.
Click here to continue.
 





 Discover Everything You Ever Wanted to Know About Long Nicholas 


 

Arrest Records, Warrants, DWI and MugshotsIf Long’s ever had a run-in with the law then his records will show where, when and why.


Addresses, Phone and EmailLong’s record will show current and past mailing addresses, phone numbers and any email addresses he’s had.


Marriage, Divorce and Birth RecordsImportant events from Long’s life have been compiled from state and local county.

  

Sex Offender RegistryFind out instantly if Long is registered as a sex offender and if he is a threat.


Hidden Online ProfilesFind out all of Long’s online social media profiles and any hidden ones you’re not supposed to know about.


Assets, Businesses and LicensesFind out if Long is hiding any assets, owns any businesses and what licenses they are registered for.

  Show Me Long's Records 


 Instant Access Anywhere and Anytime 


 

100% Anonymous and Instant
In a few minutes from now you'll get full access to Long's background in the comforts of home.
Long will not know you are looking up their background and pulling records.
With state of the art connection your search is also secure from prying eyes.


 


 Look Up Anyone You Want 



 Get Long's Records + Unlimited Searches
In addition to getting a full background on Long Nicholas, which includes contact info, arrest records, assets, bankruptcies and more, you'll also get full access to our database 24/7.
Look up anyone else you want so long as they reside in the United States of America.
Whether it's celebrities, family members or friends you're not restricted on your search.
  Get Me Long's Records and Unlimited Searches on Anyone I Want 
     




Copyright 2016 - 911arrests.com - All Rights Reserved 



























